Summary form only given. High-pressure, direct current glow discharges have been studied with respect to their use as nonthermal plasma reactors, in particular with respect to volatile organic compound (VOC) decontamination of air. The experimental setup consists of a gas handling system with flow control, a reaction chamber containing a 200 Torr to 400 Torr plasma, a buffer chamber and a gas chromatograph as diagnostic system. In experiments a premixed gas consisting of air with 300 ppm benzene was flown through a direct current plasma filament contained in a 1 mm wide and 11 mm long dielectric slit. The length of the plasma in the flow direction was about 0.8 mm. A destruction efficiency of more then 80% has been achieved with the DC method, at a residence time of the flowing gas in the plasma column of 0.2 ms. The destruction energy efficiency was measured as approximately 10/sup 15/ VOC molecules/Joule, which is lower by about a factor of six than that obtained with dielectric barrier discharges. However, by using pulsed electric fields of 10 ns duration, instead of DC voltage, we were able to increase the destruction efficiency for benzene by almost one order of magnitude.
High-pressure, direct current glow discharges [1] have been studied with respect to their use as nonthermal plasma reactors, in particular with respect to volatile organic compound (VOC) decontamination of air. The experimental setup consists of a gas handling system with flow control, a reaction chamber containing a 200 Torr to 400 Torr plasma, a buffer chamber and a gas chromatograph as diagnostic system. In experiments a premixed gas consisting of air with 300 ppm benzene was flown through a direct current plasma filament contained in a 1 mm wide and 11 mm long dielectric slit. The length of the plasma in flow direction was about 0.8 mm. A destruction efficiency of more then 80% has been achieved with the dc method, at a residence time of the flowing gas in the plasma column of 0.2 ms. The destruction energy efficiency was measured as approximately 1015 VOC molecules/Joule, which is lower by about a factor of six than that obtained with dielectric barrier discharges [2]. However, by using pulsed electric fields of 10 ns duration, instead of dc voltage, we were able to increase the destruction efficiency for benzene by almost one order of magnitude. This increased efficiency, which exceeds that obtained with barrier discharges, is assumed to be due to pulsed electron heating. The short (10 ns) high electric field pulses shift the electron energy distribution function to higher electron energies, thereby increasing the reaction rates for dissociation of VOCs considerably, without causing transition into an arc [3]. The use of arrays of these plasma filaments in combination with relatively simple nanosecond pulsed power systems, developed at the Physical Electronics Research Institute at ODU [4], might allow the application of this nonthermal plasma technology for large-scale chemical decontamination.
The paper introduces the results of experimental studies of organic compounds molecular destruction in gaseous and liquid media using a microwave discharge plasma at atmospheric pressurem. Air and argon were used as the plasma gases in the experiments on disrupture of aqueous liquid organic compounds. By applying of inversible redox indicator of methylene blue (MB) it was shown that disrupture of organic substances in microwave plasma had been based on redox reactions. It was found that MB highest efficiency in the solution took place when air plasma-supporting gas had been used. New materials such as hydrogen, acetylene, ethylene, carbon nanostructured material were generated as the result of destruction of natural gas molecules in microwave discharge plasma.
Recentlythere has been publisheda lot of papers related to the processing of aqueous solutions of organic substances discharges of different types [1]–[2][3]. We can distinguishdifferent mechanisms of interactionin the literature depending on the type [4], [5] of discharge and the type of organic substances. Literature discusses different mechanisms of interaction depending on the type [6], [7] and form of the discharge of organic substances. This paper discusses the direct interaction with the discharge of dissolved organic substances, the mechanism of water activation and interaction of active particles with organic molecules and adsorption mechanism with the participation of loading material [2], [3]. In practice all the mechanisms of interaction are realized; however, the contribution of each of them may be different. This paper studies the mechanism of interaction of microwave plasma with methylene blue (MB) solution and the solution of humic substances.
The purpose of the work is to investigate the mechanism of redox reactions occurring during activation of aqueous solutions of MB, humic substances and destruction of natural gas with microwave plasma.
Studies of the mechanism interaction of the plasma with aqueous solutions of organic compounds were performed on plasma chemical installation presented in [8]. This plant which used microwave as a source for plasmatron, is schematically shown in Fig. 1.
Microwave plasmatron is coaxial waveguide transition composed of a rectangular waveguide (1) and the coaxial line, constituting the coaxial waveguide transition (2) with a truncated hollow inner conductor (3), acting as a conduit for the entry of aqueous solutions of organic substances. The outer conductor of the coaxial line (2) moves in its extension into the circular waveguide (4) which is located there, as well as an ejector nozzle (6) and the discharge chamber (7). Plasma forming gas enters under pressure through a conduit (8). Argon and air are used for plasma formation. Magnetron (9) is used as the power source for microwave plasmatron operating in a continuous mode with up to 1.5kW adjustable output power at the operating frequency of 2450±50 MHz.
Experimental plant operates as follows. Plasma forming gas is supplied under pressure through a conduit. Then, an aqueous solution of organic substances is supplied to the hollow inner conductor (3) through the nozzle (6) of the discharge chamber (7). The nozzle sprays a stream of air flowing solution like an ejector. Then the microwave energy is supplied to the discharge chamber through a waveguide through a coaxial waveguide transition (2). At the end of the conductor zone (3) due to the incident and reflected electromagnetic wave the electric field intensity increases to the breakdown value as a result of the microwave discharge is ignited and nonequilibrium low-temperature plasma is formed. The process occurs in the way that the discharge burns in the water-gas medium, wherein all the particles of atomized aqueous solution react with the reactive plasma species.
When working with a hydrocarbon gas, the initiation system of microwave discharge in the chamber 4 is activated first. Then, through line 5 and nozzle 6 the hydrocarbon gas is supplied into the discharge chamber and turns on the magnetron. The microwave energy from the magnetron is supplied into the discharge chamber though waveguide 1 via coaxial-waveguide transition. Near the nozzle 6 due to incident and reflected electromagnetic waves the electric field is increased to the breakdown value. As a result, the microwave discharge is ignited in atmosphere of hydrocarbon gas and nonequilibrium low-temperature plasma is formed. Formation of plasma at atmospheric pressure in hydrocarbon gas proceeds in the absence of oxygen.
The design of the installation does not allow long-term solution to interact with the microwave plasma, so cyclical impact of the plasma is applied. Cyclicity is a multiple contact interaction of the test solution with microwave plasma. Cycle productivity depends on the transmission capacity of the hollow inner conductor (3), and in this unit is (2 L/h).
A. Destruction of Molecular Compounds in Aqueous Solutions
Fig. 2 shows the optical absorption spectra of the stock solution of MB (spectrum 1) and treated with microwave discharge plasma (1 treatment cycle, spectrum 2) and (2 cycles of treatment, spektr3). The spectrum observed several absorption maximums in the region of 590 nm, 290 nm and 200nm. According to the literature (Handbook Chemist etc), absorption at 290 nm and 590 nm is due to the chromophore groups MB, and absorption at 200 nm due to the intrinsic absorption of the nuclei of molecules.
As it can be seen from Fig. 2, the processing solution with MB of microwave plasma provides the intensity reduction of the peaks in the 290nm and 590nm compared with the original solutions (curves 2 and 3 in Fig. 2). In the region of 200 nm, an increase in the absorption intensity is observed. According to [1], [7], reducing the intensity of absorption at 290nm and 590nm is due to the destruction of the chromophore groups, and an increase in absorption at 200 nm is due to the formation of new compounds. The formation of new compounds may occur according to the reaction 1.
Along with the change in the absorption intensity we can observe a decrease of pH of the processed solution from 5.7 to 2.9, and an increasing concentration of nitrate ions and ozone as shown in Table1 [9].
Table 1 shows the treated solution indixes depending on the number of plasma treatment cycles. As it can be seen in Table 1, the decrease of pH solution is synchronous with the concentration increase of nitrate ions, which may be the reason for methylene blue (MB) colouring decline.
The molecules of nitrogen and oxygen are involved in the oxidation process, they come in an air-and-water mixture from air and the initial molecular gas mixture becomes chemically active non-equilibrium plasma, in which the direct nitrogen oxidation reaction with the formation of nitrogen oxides according to reactions (2, 3) appears and develops.
N2+O2↔2NO 
2NO+O2=2NO2
Ozone is formed in the microwave plasma discharge, participating in the formation of higher nitrogen oxides by the reactions of 4 and 5.
2NO2+O3=N2O5+O2
2NO+O3=N2O5
NO oxide does not react with water, NO2 oxide reacts with water to produce nitric and nitrous acid. NO2 oxide in the presence of oxygen is completely converted into nitric acid:
2NO2+H2O=HNO3+HNO2
4NO2+O2+2H2O=4HNO3
Generating of nitrogen oxides in the microwave plasma discharge and their interaction with the aqueous solution and the formation of nitric acid and the reduction of iron ions are the main redox reactions.
To exclude the possibility of the formation of nitrogen-containing compounds using air as the plasma gas, an experiment was conducted with the plasma ignition by means of argon. Table 2 shows the comparative composition treated with distilled water.
As it can be seen from Table 2 the formation of nitrogen-containing compounds and lowering the pH of the solution is respectively due to the use of air as the plasma gas.
As it can be seen in table 1, with increasing cycles increases the concentration of residual ozone in solution. According to [1] MB interaction with ozone leads to the formation of a colorless MB form by shown in the reactions 1.
According to [7] the reason for the decrease color intensity of MB may be the formation of active particles in an aqueous medium, such as H, OH and H2O2. However, the short lifetime of the H and OH radicals in aqueous media (found in lit.) has not determined the mechanism of their interaction with the dye molecules. Stable end products of recombination are the active particles, hydrogen peroxide and ozone. Ozone formation is due to the method of producing the plasma in a plasma torch using air-water environment.
When discharge passes through the gas-air mixture the dissociation reaction of oxygen atoms proceeds that is followed by the oxygen molecule interaction, due to the reactions of 8, 9 [9].
Merge particle reaction (3) is accompanied by the release of energy E=5.16eV. The role of the third particle is to carry out the excess energy of the system. In the test solution such particles can act as molecule MB. Therefore MB molecules may participate in the plasma-chemical processes and that participation can be demonstrated bleaching MB aqueous solution to form other compounds, according to the scheme shown in the reactions 1 [5].
In this paper [7] shows that the action of ozone in the first place is an attack on the CN bond and C=N. Most likely products thus will be benzene and benzene sulfonic acid (the reactions 1). Further exposure to ozone will destroy these molecules to simple carboxylic acids and higher oxides.
The experiments were performed at a flow rate of hydrocarbon gas ranging from 0.4 m3/h to 1 m3/h, the level of microwave power delivered to the discharge was varied from 0.8 kW to 2 kW. The degree of destruction of molecular compounds was determined using a chromatographic analysis of gases. Table 3 shows the composition of hydrocarbon gas used in our experimental set-up. Table 4 shows the gas composition after it has passed through the microwave discharge.
It is seen from Table 3 and Table 4 that in microwave discharge plasma the destruction of the methane and C+2 hydrocarbons molecules occurs with the formation of new compounds, such as ethylene, acetylene and hydrogen. Free carbon after discharge settles down in a form of solid particles of carbon material. Analysis of the carbon material using the X-ray diffractometer shows that the material consists of amorphous carbon and carbon nanotubes with a particle size ranging from several nm to several tens of nm.
Figure 2 shows the experimental dependence of the degree of destruction of the gas molecules on the level of microwave power delivered into the discharge. Here, as a parameter, the gas flow rate has been taken. From these results it is clear that the dependence of destruction of molecules on the level of microwave power, delivered into the discharge, has a linear character. The degree of destruction of molecular compounds of hydrocarbon gas increases when adding nitrogen to hydrocarbon gas.
In this study we demonstrate an efficient destruction of molecular compounds in microwave plasma discharge in carbon dioxide and aqueous solutions of methylene blue and humic substances. In the experiments with hydrocarbon gas we have obtained the efficiency of destruction up to 70%. As a result of gas molecular compounds destruction the formation of several substances have been observed, such as: hydrogen, ethylene, acetylene, amorphous carbon and carbon nanotubes.
The experiments with aqueous solutions show that the main processes that occur during the treatment of aqueous solutions with microwave plasma discharge are the redox reactions. Under the effect of microwave plasma discharge in the aqueous solution the destruction of complex organic compounds with new elements formation to simple compounds take place.
The results obtained in this study can be of an interest in the development of new environmentally-friendly technologies for utilization of hydrocarbon gases (natural gas, associated petroleum gas, coalmine methane, biogas) and the formation of new useful products in water purification from organic substances (humic, petroleum products, etc).
We describe a large magnetoresistance (MR) effect in organic light-emitting diodes that reaches up to 10% at fields of 10 mT at room temperature. This MR effect occurs both in /spl pi/-conjugated polymers and small molecules. Our devices do not contain any magnetic materials. We found that the MR effect is only weakly temperature dependent and does not depend on sign and direction of the applied magnetic field. This is a novel type of MR-yet to be explained theoretically-that does not have, to the best of our knowledge, an analog in inorganic semiconductor devices.
Organic π-conjugated semiconductors (OSECs), which are usually divided into the classes of small molecular weight compounds and macromolecular polymers, have been used to manufacture promising devices such as organic light-emitting diodes (OLEDs) [1]and field-effect transistors [2]. A conjugated polymer is a carbon-based macromolecule through which the valence π-electrons are delocalized. Research into the electronic and optical properties of conjugated polymers began in the 1970s after a number of seminal experimental achievements. First, the synthesis of polyacetylene thin films [3] and the subsequent success in doping these polymers to create conducting polymers [4]established the field of synthetic metals. Second, the synthesis of phenyl-based polymers (e.g., polyfluorene (PFO), Fig. 1, inset) and discovery of electroluminescence (EL) in these systems [5] established the field of polymer optoelectronics. Π-conjugated polymers exhibit electronic properties that are quite different from those observed in inorganic metals or semiconductors. These unusual electronic properties may essentially be attributed to their quasi-one-dimensionality. As for electron-electron interactions, the effects of electron-lattice coupling are enhanced in low dimensions. Therefore, charge carriers in these materials are positive and negative polarons, rather than holes and electrons. OSEC used in OLEDs are undoped, and the charge carriers are injected into the device from the metal electrodes.
In addition to π-conjugated polymers, small molecular-weight, organic compounds have also been extensively investigated. EL from OLEDs made from small molecules was first observed and extensively studied in the 1960s [6]. In 1987, a team at Kodak introduced a double-layer OLED that gave moderately low bias voltages and attractive EL efficiency [7]. The prototypical small molecular OSEC is tris-(8-hydroxyquinoline) aluminum (Alq3; see Fig. 3, inset).

A. Magnetic Field Effects in OLEDs
Davis and Bussmann [8] recently showed that the EL intensity can be modulated in OLEDs based on Alq3 by application of a magnetic field B. While studying semiconducting polymer OLEDs, we recently discovered [9] a large magnetoresistance (MR) effect, which we dubbed organic magnetoresistance (OMAR). OMAR reaches up to 10% (defined as ΔR/R≡(R(B)−R(0))/R(0); R is the device resistance) at room temperature for B=10 mT. OMAR is therefore amongst the largest of MR effects of any bulk material. The MR devices we describe can be manufactured cheaply on flexible substrates and may be also transparent. Our devices therefore hold promise for applications where large numbers of MR devices are needed, such as magnetic random-access-memory (MRAM), and applications related to OLED display screens such as touch screens, where the position of a magnetic stylus is detected (patent pending, see demonstration video at ). Our devices do not require ferromagnetic materials, resulting in a flexibility in material choice not achievable for other MR devices.
Our OMAR devices consist of a thin film of either the polymer PFO (see the inset of Fig. 1) or the small molecule Alq3 (see the inset of Fig. 3) sandwiched between a top (cathode) and bottom electrode (anode). The PFO film was fabricated by spin-coating, whereas the Alq3 film was prepared by thermal evaporation at a base pressure of 10−6 mbar. The bottom electrode consisted of the conducting polymer poly(3,4-ethylenedioxythiophene) doped with polystyrenesulphonic acid (PEDOT:PSS) spin-coated on top of indium-tin-oxide (ITO) covered glass. The top contact [Ca (covered by Al)] was evaporated through a shadow mask (active area: 1 mm2) at a base pressure of 10−6 mbar. All manufacturing steps were performed inside a nitrogen glove box. These electrode materials were chosen because of their common use in OLEDs. The MR two-terminal measurements were performed with the sample mounted on the cold finger of a closed-cycle He cryostat located between the poles of an electromagnet. The MR was determined by measuring the current I at a constant applied voltage V.
Fig. 1 shows measured OMAR traces in a PFO sandwich device (details are given in the caption) at room-temperature at different biasing voltages. We found that the obtained OMAR traces are independent of the angle between film plane and applied magnetic field. All measurements shown were performed with an in-plane magnetic field. In [9], we show that this OMAR effect is largely independent of the electron-injecting cathode material and, therefore, is related to the hole-transport through the polymer film. In addition, we found that OMAR increases by lowering the barrier for injection of holes. This shows that OMAR is not related to an interface resistance effect. The resistance-voltage characteristics of the measured device are shown as an inset to Fig. 1. It follows that the I–V characteristics of our devices are strongly nonlinear, as is usually the case for OSEC sandwich devices. We note that a power-law relationship between I and V is commonly observed in OLEDs and is usually interpreted using a model of space-charge limited current in the presence of traps [10]. Plotting the I–V characteristics on a linear plot, we found that the onset voltage is proportional to the polymer film thickness, but otherwise, the OMAR device performance is largely independent of film thickness. In Fig. 1, it is seen that ΔR/R slowly decreases with decreasing R.
Fig. 2 shows MR traces for four different temperatures between 300 K and 10 K. We find that the magnitude and width of the MR cones are relatively insensitive to temperature. The inset of Fig. 2 shows R as a function of V at the different temperatures.
B. Small Molecular OMAR Devices
Fig. 3 shows measured OMAR traces in an Alq3 sandwich device (details are given in the caption) at room-temperature at different voltages. It is seen that a large OMAR effect can also be achieved in small molecular devices. In contrast to our results in PFO, in [11], we found that OMAR in Alq3 devices is very sensitive to the choice of the electron-injecting cathode material. This observation is expected since whereas PFO is a hole transporter [12], Alq3 is known to be an electron transporter [13]. Otherwise, results similar to those in PFO were obtained.
C. Discussion of Possible Mechanisms to Explain OMAR
To the best of our knowledge, the mechanism causing OMAR is currently not known. Most MR mechanisms rely on the presence of ferromagnetic materials and are therefore not applicable to our devices. We are familiar with the following mechanisms that cause MR: 1) Lorentz force, 2) hopping magnetoresistance [14], 3) electron-electron interaction [15], and 4) weak localization [16]. It appears that mechanisms 1) and 2) cannot explain OMAR because they exclusively lead to positive MR. Mechanisms 3) and 4) occur only at very low temperatures. Back-of-the-envelope calculations show that the Zeeman energy is much smaller than the thermal energy, and the magnetic length is considerably larger than the device thickness. It therefore appears that a novel explanation for OMAR needs to be found. A theoretical understanding of OMAR will likely lead to advances in the understanding of the transport processes in OSEC, which is still relatively poorly understood. Measurements in devices using crystalline or oriented organic semiconductors may provide clues about whether an orbital or spin effect is at play.
We observed a large MR effect in both polymer and small molecular OLEDs. The effect reaches up to 10% at fields of 10 mT at room temperature, is independent of the magnetic field direction, and is only weakly temperature dependent.
In this paper, a new UV-violet emission type material 9'-((9,9-dibutyl-9H-fluorene-2,7-diyl)bis(4,1-phenylene)) bis(9H-carbazole) (DBF-2PC) was synthesized by incorporating carbazole groups and fluorine into one molecule. The steric and bulky compound DBP-2PC exhibits good thermal stabilities with high glass transition temperatures (117 °C) and good thermal stability (403 °C at 5% weight loss). The fluorescence emission of as-prepared DBP-2PC compounds results in the UV to blue-violet region of 397 nm with narrow full width half maximum (FWHM) of 44 nm in solution. Light-emitting device is successfully fabricated using the material as emitter, and emit UV to blue-violet light.
Organic light-emitting devices (OLEDs) have received considerable attention for the fabrication of next-generation flat-panel displays and solid-state illumination sources due to their demonstrated manufacturing potentials [1]. Studies on the three primary colors have made remarkable progress for OLEDs in past decade. In recent years, the rapid advancement of OLEDs has extended the emission wavelengths over the whole visible range. However, OLEDs that emit light of shorter wavelengths, i.e., blue-violet to UV, have not progressed as well, although efficient UV emitting OLEDs hold unique promise for applications in generating full-color OLED displays by irradiation of luminescent dyes; serving as a potential light source for high-density information storage devices and fluorescent sensors; white light source by using red, green and blue color conversion materials; host material for electrophosphorescence. In addition, these UV-violet emitters with wide band gap can also be used as efficient host materials for triplet dopant phosphorescent OLEDs, which can harvest both singlet and triplet excitons, yielding an internal quantum efficiency as high as 100%.
As we known, it is difficult to obtain promising materials for fabricating OLEDs with emission from blue-violet to UV because these materials possess a large band gap, which makes it hard to inject charges into the emitters. Furthermore, the effective conjugation length in these materials is short. This directly reduces the conductivity and photoluminescence efficiency which impacts the performance of OLEDs. There have been some attempts to develop blue-violet to UV organic electroluminescence (EL) devices [2]. However, further improvement in both the external quantum efficiency (EQE) and color purity of OLEDs is still necessary. Therefore, developing new blue-violet to UV emitting materials with excellent performance is desirable.
Fluorines and carbazoles were considered as efficient UV emitters for their high fluorescence efficiency, high glass transition temperature, high carrier transporting ability and larger energy gap [3]. In this work, a new fluorine based derivative, 9’(9,9-dibutyl-9H-fluorene-2,7-diyl)bis(4,1-phenylene)) bis(9H-carbazole) (DBF-2PC), was synthesized and characterized. Fluorine linked carbazole and a benzene ring was between them. Herein, the optical, electrochemical, thermal and EL properties of the DBP-2PC were also investigated. The light-emitting device was successfully fabricated using the DBP-2PC as emitter, and emit near-ultraviolet (n-UV) to deep-blue light.
All chemical reagents were used as received from commercial sources without further purification unless otherwise stated. All reactions were monitored by thin-layer chromatography (TLC) and compounds were visualized with UV light irradiation at 254 and 365 nm. Column chromatography was carried out using silica gel (300-400 mesh). 1H and 13C nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) spectra were recorded using Brüker AVANCE 400M spectrometer. Time-of-flight (TOF), matrix-assisted laser desorption ionization time-of-flight (MALDI-TOF), elemental analysis were taken with Elementar vario EL elemental analyzer. UV-vis spectra were obtained using a Shimadzu UV-2501PC while PL spectra were taken using a Perkin Elmer LS-45 fluorescence spectrophotometer. Differential scanning calorimeter (DSC) analysis were performed using a Netzsch DSC-204 differential scanning calorimeter operated at heating and cooling rates of 10°C and 70°C min−1, respectively. Melting points were determined from the second heating scan. Thermo gravimetric analysis (TGA) was performed on a Netzsch TG-209 thermogravimeter under a dry nitrogen gas flow at a heating rate of 10°C min−1. Cyclic voltammetry (CV) measurements were carried out using a PARSTAT2273 electrochemical workstation at room temperature with conventional three-electrode configuration, which consisted of a glassy carbon work electrode, a saturated calomel reference electrode and a platinum plate counter electrode. CV was carried out in MeCN containing Bu4npf6 (0.1 M) as supporting electrolyte. The electrolyte was deaerated by N2 (99.99%) for 5 min in advance. Ferrocene was added as a standard and the ferrocene/ferrocenium ion (Fc/Fc+) redox couple shows the half-wave potential (E1/2) at 0.38 V in the same measurement condition, which means that the potential of the saturated calomel is −4.42 eV relative to the oxidation potential of ferrocene at −4.8 eV below vacuum.
A mixture of 2,7-dibromo-9,9-dibutyl-9H-fluorene (0.87 g, 2 mmol), (4-(9H-carbazol-9-yl)phenyl)boronic acid (1.15 mg, 4 mmol) and palladium chloride (9 mg, 0.05 mmol) in toluene was flushed with nitrogen. Then the K2CO3 (0.6 g, 4.1 mmol) aqueous solution (6 mL) was added into above mixture. The resultant solution was stirred at 97°C for 12 hours. After cooling to room temperature, the solvent was removed under vacuum and the residue was extracted with chloroform, washed with water and dried over MgSO4. The solvent was evaporated and product was isolated by column chromatography using silica gel with a mixture of petroleum ether and dichloromethane to yield white solid. Yield: 45 %. 1H NMR (CDCl3, 400 MHz), δ (ppm): 0.72-0.80 (m, 10H), 1.14-1.19 (m, 4H), 2.12-2.16 (m, 4H), 7.32-7.34 (m, 4H), 7.44-7.46 (dd, J1=0.8 Hz, J2=7.1 Hz 4H), 7.50-7.52(d, J=8.2 Hz, 4H), 7.68-7.71 (m, 8H), 7.87-7.93 (m, 6H), 8.16-8.19 (d, J=7.8 Hz, 4H). 13C NMR (CDCl3, 400 MHz), δ (ppm): 151.909, 140.915, 140.679, 140.366, 139.251, 136.791, 128.524, 127.372, 126.156, 124.971, 123.468, 121.453, 120.341, 120.288, 119.989, 109.847, 55.392, 40.366, 26.128, 23.117, 13.859. MALDI-TOF: m/z 760.2 (M+). Anal. Calcd for C57H48N2: C 89.96, H 6.36, N 3.68; found: C 89.93, H 6.14, N 3.90. Photophysical properties of DBP-2PC were analyzed using ultraviolet-visible (UV-Vis) and photoluminescence (PL) spectrometer. The normalized absorption spectra and PL spectra of DBP-2PC in dilute chloroform solution are shown in Fig. 1. It can be seen that the absorption spectra is composed of two major absorption bands. The latter absorption can be resulting from the combination of carbazole and fluorine chromophores (Fig la). Meanwhile, the PL spectra illustrates that DBP-2PC exhibits UV to blue-violet emission with emission maxima at 397 nm (Fig. 1b). Moreover, DBP-2PC exhibits good color purity with narrow FWHM of 44 nm. Therefore, it can be used as excellent candidate for the blue-violet to UV OLEDs.
The thermal properties of these compounds were investigated by DSC and TGA as shown in Figure 2. The DSC result reveal that DBP-2PC exhibits a glass transition in the second heating cycle and the glass transition temperature (Tg reaches 117°C. Additionally, the melting point of DBP-2PC was 267°C (Fig. 2a). The TGA experiments suggest that DBP-2PC exhibits excellent thermal stabilities, with decomposition temperatures (Td) 403°C (5% weight loss) as shown in Fig. 2b. Therefore, the DBP-2PC exhibits excellent thermal stability for OLED device.
The electrochemical property of DBP-2PC was studied in solution through CV measurement using Bu4npf 6 as the supporting electrolyte and ferrocene as the internal standard (Fig. 3). During the anodic scan in MeCN, two oxidation peaks are observed around 0.7 V and 1.2 V, which can be ascribed to the oxidation of the fluorine and carbazole units of DBP-2PC. No reduction wave was detected. On the basis of the onset potentials for oxidation, we estimated the highest occupied molecular orbital (HOMO) energy level of DBP-2PC to be −5.12 eV. On the other hand, through subtraction of the optical energy gap from the HOMO energy level, we calculated the energy level of the lowest unoccupied molecular orbital (LUMO) to be −1.72 eV. The calculated HOMO level for DBP-2PC allow a lower barrier for hole injection from the ITO anode. Therefore, DBP-2PC can be used as promising hole-transport material for OLEDs.
According to the HOMO and LUMO data, DBP-2PC in this study appear to be good candidates for hole transporting and emitting materials, which is consistent with the excellent capabilities of reported carbazole and fluorine derivatives [4],[5]. From the PL results in Fig. 1, DBP-2PC is expected to emit UV to blue-violet light in OLED. The device has a simple configuration of ITO/Mo03 (5 nm)/TPD (40 nm)/emitter (60 nm)/Cs2c03 (1 nm)/Al (100 nm), where DBP-2PC is used as the emitting layer. The EL spectra of the device display a UV to blue-violet light emission (Fig. 4). The emission maxima are 400 and 424 nm, respectively.
In conclusion, we developed a novel UV-violet emission type material DBF-2PC by a Suzuki cross-coupling reaction. The steric and bulky compound DBP-2PC exhibits good thermal stabilities with high glass transition temperature (117°C) and thermal decomposition temperatures (5% weight loss at 403°C). The fluorescence emission of DBP-2PC as-prepared compounds results in the UV to blue-violet region of 397 nm with narrow full width half maximum (FWHM) of 44 nm in solution. Light-emitting device is successfully fabricated using the material as emitter, and emit UV to blue-violet light. Based on this work, investigations of other UV-violet emission type materials are currently underway in our laboratory.
Summary form only given. Many industrial processes discharge large volumes of waste gases containing low concentrations of volatile organic compounds (VOC). It is meanwhile accepted that the emissions of VOC are responsible for the formation of the photochemical smog. Moreover the toxicity of chlorinated compounds requires a strict emission control. Conventional cleaning processes such as combustion or adsorption are often not suitable for the cleaning of these off gases, since these processes cause high energy consumption especially for low concentration conditions. Meanwhile new methods for the cleaning of low-concentration waste air are being developed, among them non-thermal plasma technologies. Treatment of waste air with accelerated electrons decomposes efficiently VOC at ambient temperatures. This method generates OH-radicals in the gas phase, which rapidly oxidize the pollutants. According to our laboratory studies the process yields gaseous and particulate products which can be removed from the offgas by suitable filter systems. The advantages of this method, when compared with conventional processes are its low energy consumption and the simultaneous high removal efficiencies for many different compounds. In this paper we review the experimental and theoretical results of our R&D program, which aims at the demonstration and industrial application of this process. We describe and discuss firstly the experimental results obtained in laboratory studies aimed at the gas phase oxidation of selected organic solvents testers, aromatic compounds and chlorinated hydrocarbons) and solvent mixtures.
In this paper, we show that the chemical sensing responses of organic thin film transistors (OTFTs) based on nanostructured regioregular polythiophene are strongly dependent upon the gate biasing field and the operation mode. With different applied gate voltages the source-drain current response can be different both in sign and magnitude for the same analyte. Using swept gate voltages, sensors show larger response than when operated with a constant gate voltage. These results imply that multiple, competing sensing mechanisms exist. We propose that the sensing mechanisms for polycrystalline semiconducting polymer thin films are mainly an intragrain effect, which yields a positive response, and a grain boundary effect, which yields a negative response. Noise properties of the OTFT sensors were also investigated. For the typical sensor operation frequency range these results show that low frequency noise is the dominant noise source.
Conductive polymer sensors have shown promising sensing properties for volatile organic compound (VOC) vapors [1]. Easy chemical structure modification and the ink printing deposition capability affords the construction of a large arrays of conductive polymer chemical sensors for their use as an electronic nose [2]. We have shown that the conductivity change of polythiophene chemiresistors can be either positive or negative when exposed to VOC vapors [2]. The sign and amplitude of the sensing response depends on the analyte, the polymer thin film nanostructure and the polymer chemical structure [3]. However, relatively small sensitivity and drift limits the use of conductive polymer sensors in industrial applications. To solve these problems, materials, device design, and measurement process procedures have to be optimized. This requires a better understanding of the sensing and device mechanisms. Because of the lack of measurement variables a chemiresistor type of device can provide only limited insight into the sensing mechanisms. In this study, we investigated the sensing properties and the role of the measurement operational conditions of regioregular poly(3-hexylthiophene) (rr-P3HT) based organic thin film transistors. We have found that the applied voltages have a dramatic effect on the sensing properties. Proper gate voltage manipulation can provide better selectivity, sensitivity and less signal drift.
Bottom contact OTFTs were fabricated with a channel length of 100 µm and width of 5000 µm, as illustrated in the insert of Fig. 1(b). A highly doped n-type silicon substrate served as the gate. Source and drain contact electrodes were lithographically patterned from a sputter deposited 50 nm Au layer deposited on a 5 nm Ti adhesion layer. A 1 mg/ml rr-P3HT in toluene solution was drop casted to form the active channel. The final active channel film thickness is estimated to be around 100 nm. The device showed a p-type semiconductor characteristic. A typical dc room temperature electrical characteristic of the OTFT is shown in Fig 1(b). The plotted IDS−VGS curve was measured in the saturation region (VDS=−40V) and the field-effect mobility extracted from the slope of IDS−−−√−VGS curve, by least square fitting of the data points for VGS between −20 to −40 volts.
The synthesized rr-P3HT has a very low polydispersity index (1.1), which allows the polymer to self-assemble into highly ordered nanostructure.[3] From the phase contrast AFM image, Fig. 1(a), the rr-P3HT film shows highly ordered, densely packed nanofibril structure, which is formed by the π−π interaction between adjacent P3HT molecules. The width of the nanofibrils is approximately the length of P3HT molecule, typically on the order of 10's of nanometers depending upon the P3HT molecular weight. The length of the nanofibrils can extend to several microns providing an excellent charge transport pathway. As previously reported, this structure has been found to give unique chemical responses [2], [3].
The OTFTs were tested at room temperature, in an enclosed, rectangular test chamber with a volume of less than 5 in3, for their sensing performance to various concentrations of VOC vapors. A 1 L/min nitrogen gas flow was used as a back ground carrier gas. The temporal response of IDS of an rr-P3HT OTFT as a function of exposure to acetone vapor, when the VGS were held at various constant values (VDS=−5V), is shown in Figure 2. This response we refer to as DC response while measuring IDS since the VGS and VDS are essentially constant. As can be seen, the amplitude of IDS decreased when the OTFT was exposed to acetone vapor. However, the drain current returned to the baseline after exposure removal showing the response to be reversible. The t90 response time was less than 1 min for 0 V gate voltages. The magnitude of this negative IDS response increased with increasing applied gate voltage magnitude. The sensor was further tested for 10 different analytes. Figure 3 illustrates the normalized IDS response per ppm for each of these at different applied gate voltages. It is clear that the response pattern of polar and nonpolar analytes are very different. Even within the polar analyte class, the response pattern for alcohols, acetone, and acetonitrile are different. Not only does the response change sign, but the response sensitivities to VGS vary markedly. These observations can be used to distinguish between polar and nonpolar analytes, and hence provides better sensor selectivity.
The sensor was also tested in dynamic operation mode, where the gate voltage and source-drain voltage were constantly being swept. Figure 4 shows an example of such tests. Here, at each gate voltage, from −40 V to −10 V, the source-drain voltage was swept from 0 to −40 V. It can be seen that the IDS response increases with the increase of source-drain voltage and gate voltage. We found the dynamic operation can give a much larger response than the DC response, as shown in Figure 5.
Noise is commonly found in electronic systems and devices. It is one of the most important characteristics as it directly determines the performance of the device. The signal to noise ratio (SNR) commonly determines the lowest detection limit of a sensor. The major noise sources are thermal noise, shot current noise, and low frequency noise. The noise properties of P3HT OTFT were measured by using a low noise current amplifier (SRS570) and a HP 3562A dynamic signal analyzer. The source-drain current noise spectral density was captured in the frequency range from 1 Hz to 1 kHz. As is shown in Figure 6, clearly, the dominant noise at low frequencies for the rr-P3HT OTFTs is 1/f in character with a corner frequency between 100 Hz and 1 kHz.
Grain boundary effects have been proposed as the main sensing mechanism in OTFTs [4], [5]. The barrier potential at the grain boundaries increases with absorbed analyte, therefore, reducing the source-drain current of the transistor. This theory appears to hold for most oligomer thin film transistors, where small molecules are densely packed inside the grain, and so inhibits the diffusion of the analyte into the bulk of the individual grains, but not at the grain boundaries. However, in our study, both positive and negative current changes were observed, which implies that more than one major mechanism are simultaneously at play. Besides the grain boundary effect, an intra-grain effect could also be taking place. The long alkyl side chain of P3HT molecule not only helps to form a highly ordered thin film microstructure, but also creates space between polymer molecules allowing analyte to diffuse into the bulk of the grain. The ability of the analyte molecule to diffuse in between the lamella layers could very well be the origin of positive drain-source current changes. The current increase can be achieved in several possible ways. Firstly, the dipole-dipole interaction (or induced dipole-dipole interaction in the case of non-polar analytes) between analyte and polymer molecule can pull the polymer molecules closer together therefore promoting the charge hopping transport by reducing the hopping distance. Secondly, the interaction between analyte and polymer molecule can temporarily improve the ordering of the crystalline structure via molecular conformational changes. This has also been referred to as the secondary doping effect. Both of these mechanisms can improve charge transport through polymer molecule conformational changes and both are usually reversible with the removal of the analyte.
The sensor response will depend on the dominant mechanism, which depends on the analyte property and sensor operation condition. For polar analytes with large dipole moment such as acetone, it seems the grain boundary effect dominates over the intra-grain effect, therefore, the sensor response is negative. For nonpolar analytes such as toluene, the intra-grain effect appears to dominate over the grain boundary effect, resulting in a positive sensor response.
At the same time, the interaction between polymer molecule and analyte molecule may be different at different locations and depth of the thin film. The intra-grain effect seems to be stronger at the surface and the bulk of the thin film, while the grain boundary effect is stronger at the polymer-insulator interface of the OTFT. This can explain why a large negative gate voltage causes the negative sensor response, because most charges are conducting at the polymer-insulator interface. Because diffusion times can be different for different location in the film this implies that the dominant response mechanism can vary with the time of exposure. Likewise, because of charge trapping at grain boundaries the response mechanisms can also vary with the time after the applied voltage. These effects imply the response mechanisms can be coupled via exposure time and applied voltages resulting in time evolving processes. Understanding of these effects may allow the development of new operational methods which will allow a single sensing material to have a greater selectivity.
There are several interesting observations from the dynamic sensor measurements. Firstly, the sensor signal is much larger than when the devices are operated in the DC mode. Secondly, polar analytes show a larger response than nonpolar analytes. Thirdly, the dynamic responses are all negative.
For polycrystalline thin films, charge is commonly trapped at the grain boundaries. The trapped charge causes two consequences. First a grain boundary potential forms that limits the charge transport between grains. Second, trapped charges can reduce further available trapping states for the analyte molecule. Therefore, for the DC operation mode, the constant negative gate voltage facilitates a charge buildup process at the insulator interfaces resulting in the trapped charge density at grain boundary being larger long before the analyte exposure. Assuming then that the trap state density is finite, or that it has an energy distribution, this then limits the potential for additional trapped charge during analyte exposure. Hence, the change in the conductivity due to analyte exposure is reduced. However, in the dynamic measurement process, since the gate voltage is swept the electric field at the interface is continuously being reversed. This results in the background, field driven, trapped charge density being smaller than it would have been for a fixed, DC voltage condition. Therefore, since the total trapped charge is reduced it is easier for the mobile charge to become trapped at the grain boundaries during analyte exposure, resulting in a larger sensing response.
Meanwhile, since the dynamic sensor signal was taken at a large negative gate voltage, where the grain boundary effect is the strongest, this causes all dynamic responses to be negative. This is why polar analytes generally have shown a larger response than nonpolar analytes when the sensor is operated in the dynamic mode. This also means a combined DC and dynamic operation mode should provide more complete sensing information.
A relatively poor detection limit has been a drawback for polymer sensors. The detection limit is largely determined by the sensor SNR, which is dependent upon sensor sensitivity and noise properties. As shown in Figure 6, 1/f noise is the dominant noise in P3HT OTFT sensors. Both our work and that of others suggests that the 1/f noise in P3HT OTFTs is strongly correlated to the thin film microstructure and grain boundary density [6], [7]. High molecular weight P3HT material with low grain boundary density showed a lower noise level. This suggests a high molecular weight sample should be used for lower noise OTFTs. However, if a sensor is to have high sensitivity to polar analytes, based on the grain boundary effect concept, then a higher grain boundary density is desired. Therefore, within a single material the tradeoff between lower noise and higher sensitivity must be optimized. To get a low detection limit to different analytes, different molecular weight P3HT materials may have to be used.
In conclusion, we demonstrated that P3HT OTFTs can not only detect, but also discriminate between VOC vapors with improved sensor performance via the combined use of DC and dynamic operational modes. The SNR of OTFT sensors is limited by the low frequency noise properties. Hopefully these results can help to provide guidance for the design of polymer sensors with better detection limits.
In this work, two types of III-V nitride heterojunction based dual channel microcantilevers are demonstrated to perform selective detection of various organic vapors in a dilute mixture. The detection scheme relies on self-heating or passive heating of the unfunctionalized cantilever channels and the analytes can be identified by correlating the sensor response with the latent heat of evaporation of the analytes. When both types of cantilevers are used together, the devices can not only identify each constituent of a VOC mixture, but also determine the concentration of each of them.
Detection and quantification of volatile organic compounds (VOCs), many of which are considered as health hazards, have become a very important task due to their increasing presence in the household and industrial atmospheres. [1] Over the past years, we have seen the development of many popular techniques for VOC detection. [2]–[3][4][5][6][7] however, those techniques most of the time suffered from one or more of the following issues - high power consumption, limited selectivity, low sensitivity, slow response, complicated functionalization technique, inability to analyze an analyte mixture and expensive/bulky characterization tools required in the process. In our previous reports, [8]–[9] we demonstrated aIII-V nitride heterojunction based single channel triangular micro cantilever heater (TMH), capable of selective detection of a wide range of VOCs without any functionalization. In the current work, we present two dual channel microcantilever heaters (Fig. 1). The first one, called monolithic tip dual channel cantilever (MDC-MH), has two electrically conducting parallel channels on the same cantilever. The second variation, called split tip dual channel cantilever (SDC-MH) has an airgap between the two channels near the apex of the cantilever. Both devices work primarily by vaporizing conglomerated analyte molecules around the heated apex; which happens only above a particular voltage bias designated as the analyte-specific threshold voltage bias (Vth.) that can be correlated to the latent heat of vaporization of that particular analyte.
Due to the presence of two parallel channels, it is possible to use one channel as a heater and the other one as a sensor.[10] While the heater channel undergoes Joule heating under high bias, the sensor channel can be biased at a small voltage and still be heated by the heater channel. This feature adds unique capabilities to these cantilevers, making them more sensitive and selective with better resolution and detection limit. The airgap between the channels of SDC-MH introduces an additional modality of sensing that can be used to estimate the concentration of the analyte being tested. Most importantly, when used together, MDC-MH and SDC-MH can identify each component of a mixture of VOCs and determine the concentration of each analyte with remarkable accuracy. These capabilities make these microcantilever heaters very useful as environmental sensors, where the ability to selectively detect a mixture of organic pollutants is of paramount importance.
A. Fabrication of Cantilevers
The cantilevers were fabricated on AlGaN/GaN HEMT Epi wafer grown on silicon (111) substrate, which had 2 nm iGaN and 15 nm A10.25Ga0.75N on 1 µm iGaN, with 300 nm buffer layer separating the GaN layer from 750μm Si substrate. The AlGaN mesa and the GaN cantilever outline were created by etching AlGaN/GaN using an inductively coupled plasma etcher with Cl2/BCl3 gas chemistry. Ohmic contacts were made with Ti/AliTi/Au, annealed at 800 °C.
Extended contact pads were made of another layer of Ti/Au stack. Finally Bosch process was used to etch the sacrificial Si layer from the bottom of the sample to release the cantilevers. The length of each cantilever arm from base to tip was 130μm, width was 30μm at the base. The arms were separated by a 100μm gap at the base. The tip width was 4 µm and the two channels had a width of about 1.5μm at the tip. The thickness of the cantilevers was ~700 nm.
B. Electrical and Sensing Setups
The experimental setup used for sensing volatile organic compounds involved a test chamber with vapor inlets and an outlet. Mass flow controllers (MFC) were used to control the concentration of the VOC vapor by flowing ultra-high purity (UHP) N2 carrier gas through a bubbler maintained at a constant temperature of 30°C on a hotplate. A solenoid valve was used to tune the duty cycle of the vapor flow going into a dilution chamber where UHP N2 from another MFC was mixed with the incoming vapor flow. The duty cycle of the bubbler outlet and the ratio of the vapor/N2, flow rates were adjusted to obtain the desired concentration of the vapor. For experiments with multiple VOCs, each VOC was put in its own MFC/bubbler assembly and the vapors from such channels were mixed in the dilution chamber with N2 to produce the mixed vapor. The electrical and sensing characterizations were performed using Agilent B2902 and Keithley 2612A source measure units (SMU). For all sensing experiments, a continuous voltage sweep with a resolution of 10mV was used. The maximum power dissipation of these devices did not exceed 3 mW at a voltage of 15 V, [10] with an estimated peak temperature less than 450°C.
C. Different Modes of Sensor Response
The heater channels of the cantilevers were biased at variable sweeping voltage of 0–15 V, whereas the sensor channels were kept at constant 100 mV bias. Therefore, the heater channels experienced self-heating (Joule heating), which caused the adjacent sensor channels to heat up as well. The sensor output is the normalized differential current, expressed by-
where, Ivap is the current measured in test condition and I0 is the current measured in UHP N2, V is the applied bias. When ΔI/I0 is measured from the heater channel, it is called the self-heating response (i.e. response caused by self-heating of this channel). ΔI/I0 can also be measured from the sensor channel, which is called the secondary heating response. Both responses are correlated with the same bias voltage applied across the heater channel.
A. Selective Detection of Vocs Using Mdc-Mh
When a single analyte or a mixture of different analytes is introduced into the chamber with an MDC-MH under appropriate bias conditions mentioned earlier, the current through each of the two channels may change depending on the analyte(s) and bias voltages. As discussed in our previous reports, [8]–[9] there exists a unique threshold voltage (Vth) bias for each analyte, below which the heater channel does not exhibit self-heating response. In case of multiple analytes being present in the system, the response curve shows sudden changes around the threshold voltages for the individual analytes, as shown in Fig. 2(a); which becomes obvious in the second order derivative (with respect to heater channel bias) of this curve shown in Fig. 2(c) where we can see different peaks for different analytes. As the temperature of the sensor channel is dependent on that of the heater channel, the sensor channel also shows such responses, but at higher voltages as shown in Fig. 2(b) and (d). Comparing Fig. 2(c) and (d), it is observed that the first two peaks (i.e. VthS for 2-propanol and ethanol) in (c) are very close to each other and are virtually indistinguishable, which is not the case in (d); where these two peaks can be clearly identified. While all six peaks are situated within a bias range of 1.7 V in (c), they take up a bias range of 3.6 V in (d); the wider range in (d) allows larger separation among the peaks, making them easier to identify.
From Fig. 3, we observe that the threshold voltage (Vth.) for each analyte is strongly correlated with the molar latent heat of evaporation ΔHvap of that analyte, for both self- and secondary heating responses. Although both datasets are strictly linear; the slope of the fitted line is larger for secondary heating response. This also reflects the fact that there exists a larger separation between Vths of two analytes with very close latent heat of evaporation (e.g. 2-propanol and ethanol), which leads to better selectivity. This is a significant improvement over the self-heating response which was the only mechanism shown in our previous reports on a triangular micro cantilever heater (TMH). [8]–[9] More experimental results with other pure and mixed analytes are available in [10]; the effects of humidity and other atmospheric gases are also discussed in [8] and [10].
B. Concentration Determination of Vocs Using Sdc-Mh
The self-heating response of an SDC-MH is similar to that of an MDC-MH, but the secondary heating response is significantly different for a SDC-MH (Fig. 4(a)) because of the airgap present in between the two channels near the tip region. The first order derivative (with respect to heater bias) of the curves shown in Fig. 4(a)are shown in Fig. 4(b), where we see a pair of peaks (i.e. Vth) for each analyte present in the testing environment. The low voltage peaks (Vth,low) are almost identical to the self-heating VthS of this device, obtained from the heater channel; whereas the second peaks (Vth,high occur at significantly higher voltages. The response curves for 100, 500 and 1000 ppm of 2-propanol show that the Vth,low is not a function of concentration, but Vth,high is. The bottom-most curve in Fig. 4(b)shows the applicability of this method to a mixture of analytes, as two pairs of Vthsare shown for the two analytes (1- and 2-propanol). These observations can be used to determine the concentration of each analyte present in the mixture as shown in Fig. 5. Here we see that the ratio Vth,highVth,low is a logarithmic function of concentration above ~40 ppm. While MDC-MH is capable of detecting an analyte with concentration as low as 5 ppm or lower (estimated to x003C;1 ppm limited by noise [10]); SDC-MH can be very useful by providing a good estimate on the concentration of the analytes already identified by an accompanying MDC-MH.
In this work, we demonstrated two unfunctionalized dual channel microcantilever heaters for highly selective detection of a wide range of volatile organic compounds individually or in a mixture; where the analytes could be differentiated based on their latent heat of evaporation. Utilizing separate heater and sensor channels, these microcantilevers heaters demonstrated much superior sensing capability compared to the single-channel ones; and could also estimate the concentration of each analyte in the mixture. These results are very promising for developing integrated VOC detection chips for miniaturized handheld sensor systems that can find widespread usage in industrial, medical and home-based monitoring applications.
A simple volatile organic compound (VOC) sensor based on a tapered small core singlemode fiber (SCSMF) structure is reported. The tapered SCSMF fiber structure with a waist diameter of 7.0 μm is fabricated using a customized microheater brushing technique. Silica based material containing immobilized Nile red was prepared by a sol-gel method and was used as a coating applied to the surface of the tapered fiber structure. Different coating thicknesses created by a 2-pass and 4-pass coating process are investigated. The experiments demonstrate that both sensors show a linear response at different gas concentrations to all three tested VOCs (methanol, ethanol and acetone). The sensor with a thicker coating shows better sensitivities but longer response and recovery times. The best measurement resolutions for the 4-pass coating sensor are estimated to be 2.3 ppm, 1.5 ppm and 3.1 ppm for methanol, ethanol and acetone, respectively. The fastest response and recovery time of 1 min and 5 min are demonstrated by the sensor in the case of methanol.
Many indoor air pollutants require detection, monitoring and analysis due to their harmful effects on human health. Hence there is an increasing interest in the development of sensors capable to realizing these functions [1]. Poor indoor air quality can be frequently be attributed to volatile organic compounds (VOCs) defined as chemical compounds that can easily evaporate at room temperature. To date, a number of sensing techniques have been proposed to monitor the concentration of VOCs, for example semi-conductor metal oxides detectors [1], surface acoustic waves methods [2], chemiresistors [3], colorimetric sensors [4]and fiber optics sensors [5]. Among these techniques, fiber optic sensors have several unique advantages such as very compact size, real-time operation, immunity to electromagnetic interference, remote sensing capabilities and the ability to operate at room temperature.
Implementing a VOCs sensor based on an optical fiber usually requires some additional coating materials to be deposited on the fiber surface. By monitoring the changes in the optical properties of the fiber coating due to either physical or chemical reactions between VOCs and the coating material, the level of VOC concentration can be detected, assuming calibration has taken place. Several materials suitable for the VOC sensing have been reported to date, including semiconductor metal oxides (TiO2, ITO) [6]–[7], vapochromic materials [8], metal based nanomaterials [9] and chemical dyes with solvatochromic properties [10]. Semiconductor metal oxides have been widely used in commercial chemical vapor sensors. However, a significant disadvantage of these materials is that they normally work at high temperatures (200–500 °C) displaying a very limited sensitivity at room temperature (usually with a detection limit of tens or hundreds of ppm). Vapochromic material based VOCs sensor shows even worse sensitivity than semiconducting metal oxides. Recently, MRR Khan et. al. [5] proposed a highly sensitive VOCs sensor based on a side-polished single-mode fiber with a coating by incorporating a solvatochromic dye material (Nile red) with N,N-dimethylacetamide (DMAC) and PVP. The proposed sensor has a very narrow measurement range and the fabrication of side polished fiber and the lateral spin coating process are relatively complex and expensive.
In our previous work, we reported that a tapered small core single mode fiber (SCSMF) shows an ultra-high refractive index (RI) sensitivity especially in a surrounding environment with a high RI [11]. In this work, we propose and demonstrate a simple VOCs sensor by coating a mixture of Nile red and sol-gel silica on a tapered SCSMF structure, for the measurement of the concentration of three different VOCs: methanol, ethanol and acetone. As an immobilizing coating material, silica sol-gel has been widely used in chemical sensing. Compared with other immobilizing coating nanomaterials, sol silica shows better adhesion to the fiber surface because both the optical fiber sensor surface and the coating are based on silica. More importantly, using the silica sol-gel as a base material should allow for tuning the RI surface morphology, pore size and pore ratio of the coating, through the coating fabrication process, with the potential to achieve a higher sensitivity for the sensor.
In this experiment, a tapered SCSMF structure with a waist diameter of 7.0 µm was fabricated by a customized microheater brushing technique [12]. A mixture of Nile red and sol-gel silica solution for the coating layer was prepared as follows: 1) 10 ml of hydrolyzing tetraethylorthosilicate (TEOS) was mixed with 5 ml of ethanol using magnetic stirring for 20 minutes at room temperature; 2) 1 ml 0.1 mol/L HC1 solution was added into the mixture followed with further stirring for 3 hours; 3) 10 mg of Nile red was mixed with 6 ml of the sol-gel silica solution under stirring for one more hour, after which the final sol-gel solution was ready for the coating process. A thin layer of silica on the tapered fiber surface was coated by the dip coating method. A single dip coating cycle is defined as a one-pass coating. By repeating the one-pass coating process, different silica coating thicknesses can be realized. When the desired number of the coating passes was completed, the fiber sensor was cured at room temperature for three days before use. It should be noted that after each pass, the coating was left to dry for 6 minutes before the next coating layer was applied. In our experiment, 2-pass coating and 4-pass coating were selected and realized with the same tapered SCSMF structure.
Figure 1(a) illustrates a schematic diagram of the proposed sensor coated with a mixture of Nile red and sol-gel silica and (b) shows a schematic diagram of the test system for VOCs sensing. Light from a broadband light source (Thorlabs S5FC1005S) is launched into the tapered SCSMF structure and the transmitted light is measured by an optical spectrum analyzer (OSA) (Agilent 86142B). An accurately measured amount of diluted VOC liquid (ethanol, methanol or acetone) was dropped into the gas testing chamber by a micro-syringe. The VOC will quickly evaporate naturally within the chamber, generating VOCs gas vapors with predictable concentrations, which depend on the volume of VOC liquid used. As the VOC vapors reacts with the Nile red, the RI of the coating changes, resulting in the variation of the measured spectral response. Assuming a suitable calibration has taken place, the concentration of the VOC can be accurately determined. All the tests were conducted at room temperature.
shows the measured spectral responses for the 4-pass coating sensor at different ethanol concentrations. The spectral responses for the 2-pass coating sensor and other VOCs are similar and hence are not shown here for the sake of brevity. It is clear that as the VOC concentration in the air within the chamber increases, the spectral dip wavelength shifts monotonically toward a longer wavelength. Fig. 2(b) and 2(c) show the measured wavelength shift vs. three different VOC concentrations for the 4-pass coating and 2-pass coating sensors respectively. As one can see from the figures, the 4-pass coating sensor has higher sensitivities than those of the 2-pass coating sensor for all three tested VOCs. Both sensors exhibit the highest sensitivity to ethanol, which may be attributed to better solvent polarity. For both sensors the measured wavelength shifts versus different VOCs' concentrations show good linearity. Assuming an OSA has a wavelength resolution of 0.01 nm, the measurement resolution for the 2-pass and 4-pass coating sensors are estimated to be 7.2 ppm and 2.3 ppm, 3.4 ppm and 1.5 ppm, 5.9 ppm and 3.1 ppm for methanol, ethanol and acetone, respectively, which is comparable or higher than that previously reported [6, 9, 13–14].
The sensors' response and recovery times for different VOCs are also investigated for a fixed concentration of 40 ppm as shown in Figure 3. The response time is defined as the time that takes the sensor to reach 90% of its full wavelength shift response and the recovery time is defined as the time taken to fall down to 10% of the full response. From Figure 2 it can be seen that as the coating thickness increases, the sensor's response and recovery times increase. Among the three studied VOCs, methanol and acetone show the fastest and slowest response and recovery of 1 minute and 5 minutes, 8 minute and 12 minutes, respectively. It should be noted that given the physical air volume of the chamber, the evaporation within the chamber and the subsequent evacuation of the chamber takes a finite amount of time and thus the actual sensor response times are likely to be shorter.
In conclusion, a novel VOCs gas sensor is proposed and experimentally demonstrated based on a simple tapered SCSMF fiber structure. A mixture of Nile red and sol-gel silica was employed as the coating material and applied to the fiber surface with different coating thicknesses for detecting three different VOCs' concentrations including methanol, ethanol and acetone. The experimental results show that both sensors with a thicker (4-pass) and a thinner (2-pass) coating show the best sensitivity to ethanol, and have linear wavelength shift responses vs. different gas concentrations for all three tested gases. By increasing the coating thickness, the sensor's sensitivity can be improved but at the expense of slower response and recovery times. The best measurement resolutions are achieved for the 4-pass coating sensor and are estimated to be 2.3 ppm, 1.5 ppm and 3.1 ppm for methanol, ethanol and acetone, respectively. The response and recovery varies from 1 min to 12 mins for all the three VOCs.
Organic compounds were shown to exist on the failed electric contacts of printed circuit boards in mobile phones. The compounds adhered to both dust particles and wear debris and caused contact failure under dynamic conditions. As one of the organic compounds found on the contaminated electric contacts in failed mobile phones, sodium lactate was chosen for investigation. The physical characteristics of sodium lactate were measured so that the adhesive function of sodium lactate with dust particles could be estimated theoretically and proven by vibration experiments. The hygroscopic and evaporative performance of the sodium lactate was tested, and the relationship between the hygroscopic performance and the insulation resistance was also discussed. The electrical behavior of the dust contaminated contacts with the organics was studied by sliding tests. The experimental results could lead to a method for applying organics in the simulation of dust environments for electric contacts.
A simulated experiment on purification of volatile organic compounds (VOCs) was carried out in two vortex flow reactors, which consisted of a microwave plasma torch and a reaction chamber with a fuel injector. One is the reactor with a conventional vortex flow, and the other is with a reverse vortex flow. Injection of hydrocarbon fuels into a high-temperature microwave torch plasma provides a plasma flame. The plasma flame can eliminate the odorous chemical agent diluted in air or purify the contaminated air of a large volume from continuous emission. The reverse vortex reactor eliminated VOCs diluted in an airflow rate of 10000 lpm, showing β-value of 80.39 J/L, while the conventional vortex reactor eliminated VOCs with β-value of 100.26 J/L.
As shown in the large number of articles and conference contributions published over the last several years, a lot of attention for the elimination of volatile organic compounds (VOCs) in air has placed on a purification system and is increasing [1]–[2][3]. From the reason that VOCs are harmful to human beings, plants, and animals, and they contribute to the greenhouse effect; VOCs are regulated aerial [4].
Until now, several technologies for destroying VOCs have been investigated; they include catalytic oxidation [5], thermal decomposition [4], bio-filtration [6], activated carbon adsorption [7], membrane separation [8], UV oxidation [9], ozone destruction [10], plasma oxidation [11], etc. These approaches encounter the hurdles, such as the degradation of catalyst, the production of harmful byproducts, the deterioration of absorption capability, the organic film formation on a lamp surface, and the high electricity consumption. In this regard, we proposed a plasma burning system that combined a microwave plasma with a hydrocarbon fuel [12], [13] to meet the requirement for treating contaminant air at high flow rate (over 100 Nm3 /min). For example, without a hydrocarbon fuel, the temperature of a microwave plasma torch flame at 5 cm from the center of the microwave-driven region was only about 600 K. On the other side, with 10 liters per minute (lpm) of CH4 as a hydrocarbon fuel, the temperature of plasma flame at the same position increased to 1890 K [14]. Accordingly, it is expected that a plasma flame made from a microwave plasma and a hydrocarbon-burning flame can increase the destruction removal efficiency (DRE). Here, we investigate the comparison of DREs for VOCs in two reactors with conventional and reverse vortex flows based on the microwave plasma burning system.
The design and operation of a microwave plasma torch were described in detail in previous works [12], [13]. The microwave radiation at 2.45 GHz from a magnetron passes through a circulator, a directional coupler for power monitoring, and 3-stub tuner and it is guided through a tapered waveguide, entering a discharge tube made of fused quartz. Compressed air enters the discharge tube in the form of a swirling gas through an injection port that creates a vortex flow in the discharge tube, where a plasma torch at temperature of 6000 K and an electron density on the order of ∼1013 /cm3 is generated [13].
Fig. 1 shows a schematic of the reaction chambers in side view. The reactors in Fig. 1 are attached to the microwave plasma torch. In detail, a flange labeled with “To plasma torch” in Fig. 1 is connected to an upper wide wall of tapered waveguide in the microwave plasma torch system. For the conventional vortex reactor (CVR) in Fig. 1(a), the contaminated air enters the outer compartment through tangential inlets on the upper part of the reactor (opposite part of the decontaminated air exit); this entering gas forms swirling flows in the inner compartment via the four tangential slits that are installed on the inner compartment. In contrast, for reverse vortex reactor (RVR) in Fig. 1(b), the contaminated air enters the outer compartment through tangential inlets on the lower part of the reactor (inlets near the decontaminated air exit). The pollutant gas in the RVR serves as a gas shield by swirling along the inner surface of the inner compartment from the lower part of the slits to the upper part. This gas shield reduces heat losses from the reactor, and eventually, it is transferred to the inner compartment of the reactor, where encounters the plasma flame made from the torch plasma and the fuel combustion flame. In measurements, average temperatures for three parts of reactors, which are upper, middle, and lower parts in Fig. 1 are 29, 24, and 22 °C for RVR and 37, 32, and 28 °C for CVR, respectively, showing slight temperature differences.
In this paper, the experimental results were presented by making use of a simple first order decay model for eliminating target chemicals. The VOCs destruction model can be expressed as X/X0=exp(E/β) , where X represents the leftover concentration of the VOCs after the plasma flame treatment and X0 is the initial concentration before the treatment, E denotes the input energy density (in units of joules per liter) deposited on the contaminated air by the plasma flame during the treatment, and β represents the energy density required for bringing down the concentration to 1/e of its initial concentration; i.e., the energy density needed for 63% destruction. A total hydrocarbon (THC) measurement system was employed to determine the reduction in VOCs concentrations. The THC measurement system is a flame ionization detector with a detection range from 0 to 10000 ppm; it has resolutions of 0.1 ppm for concentrations up to 1000 ppm and 1 ppm for concentrations above 1000 ppm. The VOC concentration was measured before liquefied natural gas (LNG) injection, measuring only the THC concentration in the processed gas. In addition, the unburned LNG has not influenced on the final concentration of VOC after the treatment because of LNG was combusted close to 100%, showing that the methane trace was not found in Fourier transform infrared spectrum. The simulation VOCs used in this test were composed of isopropyl alcohol, ethanol, methanol, and tetramethyl ammonium hydroxide with the mixing ratio of 4:3:2:1 , respectively.
The data points in Fig. 2 indicate the average leftover VOCs concentrations for conventional vortex reactor (square dots) and reverse vortex reactor (circle dots) obtained from the repeated measurements in terms of the input energy densities by means of the LNG. The energy contained in methane is 9.52×106 cal/m3 ; hence, the fuel injection rate can be converted to power. For example, an LNG injection rate of 20 lpm corresponds to a power of 13.3 kW. The detailed simulated experiments for eliminating VOCs were carried out in terms of the input energy density of the microwave plasma burner at 2 kW plasma power. The initial concentration of VOCs diluted in the total air-flow rate of 10000 lpm was X0=1000 ppm. The curves in Fig. 2 represent the least squared fits to the experimental data points for the microwave plasma burner.
Recently, Malik et al. [15] reported the VOC decomposition in a plasma catalytic reactor packed with aluminum oxide and silica gel. From their experimental results, toluene, benzene, hexane, and methane at the concentration of 300 ppm and the flow rate of 0.1 lpm were treated in corona discharge with no catalyst packing, showing that DREs are 80%, 50%, 45%, and 8% at the specific energy of about 11 J/L, respectively. In the case of the plasmacatalyst reactor with silica gel, DRE of hexane reached almost 100% after 1 h continuous treatment, showing the improvement of the energy efficiency for destruction of hexane by more than 50% over the energy efficiency of a reactor without silica gel. However, its DRE decreased to about 40% after 27 h, showing the reduction of catalyst performance. In fact, it is difficult at different experimental parameters, flow rate and initial concentration, to compare the results between our experiment and [15]. It is suggested that not only any plasma but also appropriate catalyst should be considered in treating VOC materials.
Eventually, the β -values of VOCs for the conventional vortex reactor and reverse vortex reactor by the LPG plasma burner are 100.26 J/L and 80.39 J/L, respectively. Namely, for most values of X /X in Fig. 2, the reverse vortex reactor design requires smaller energy densities than the conventional vortex reactor design destroyed for the same fraction of VOCs. These experimental results indicate that the microwave plasma burner with reverse vortex flows can be effective for decontaminating polluted air at high flow rates.
Alveolar air Volatile Organic Compound (VOC) extractor is a handheld breath-sampling device for clinical breath analysis. The device consists two main components: (1) An alveolar air separator, (2) A VOC extractor. The alveolar air separator splits exhaled air based on total exhaled air volume directing alveolar air towards the VOC extractor and dead space air to into an exhaust channel. The VOC extractor collects the VOCs from alveolar air into a modified Sold Phase Micro Extraction (SPME) filament. Feasibility of using the SPME filament to collect a quantifiable breath sample directly from exhaled breath is experimentally validated. Exhaled breath acetone is quantified using alveolar air VOC extractor and a GC/MS system.
More than one thousand Volatile Organic Compounds (VOCs) have been detected in exhaled breath including some that have been identified as biomarkers for various diseases and metabolic conditions [1]. These biomarkers are associated with lipid peroxidation, liver diseases, renal failure, allograft rejection, cancer, glucose metabolism, cholesterol metabolism and many other health conditions. Although breath analysis inherently has many advantages, it still remains underutilized as a standard diagnostic method. This is partly due to inadequacy of medical devices needed for clinical breath analysis. Breath sampling is a critical step in breath analysis. To this date there is no breath-sampling device suitable for routine clinical diagnosis [2], [3].
Alveolar breath sampling is more suitable than mixed expiratory sampling in producing a standard breath sample. Mixed expiratory sampling collects the total volume of air exhaled, including the air in the upper regions (nose, pharynx, trachea and bronchi) of the respiratory systems (so called dead space air) that does not participate the in the gas exchange [4]. Alveolar air located in the alveoli, alveolar sacs and atria, participates in the gas exchange and contains high endogenous VOC concentrations. Inclusion of dead space air in a breath sample leads to variable dilution of the breath sample and contamination from exogenous VOCs [5].
Most of the alveolar breath-sampling devices are based on the Haldane-Priestly tube [6]. Devices that adapted this method empty the total exhaled air into a tube or a temporary reservoir and alveolar air is pumped out to a breath sampling container [7], [8], [9]. Although these devices serve the purpose of collecting alveolar air, they lack portability, ability of collecting a standard sample and ease of use as a standalone Point-of-Care (POC) device.
Concentrations of identified biomarkers fall in the nmol/l to pmol/l (ppb-ppt) range and usually need pre-concentration prior to analysis. Common methods of pre-concentration are adsorption onto sorbent traps, coated fibers and cryofocussation. Extracted VOCs are transferred from the adsorption material into an analytical device by heating or microwave energy. Breath samples are analyzed using high sensitive instruments such as Mass Spectrometry (MS) systems. MS systems are often coupled with Gas Chromatography (GC) for initial separation [2], [3].
Complexity of MS based systems has lead to the development of sensor-based analyzers for rapid POC diagnosis. Sensor based VOC analyzers may have a promising future, but at the current state they are lacking the required sensitivity and selectivity for direct breath analysis. VOC sensors are highly sensitive to flow rate, humidity and temperature which varies dynamically in exhaled breath and none of the sensors have demonstrated the feasibility of directly analyzing exhaled breath. Most of the sensors do not have the required response time to perform breath-to-breath analysis.
Although development of sensor based portable VOC analyzers are essential to realize the true potential of breath analysis, the current state of the art demands for a clinically viable device capable of collecting a breath sample at POC into a GC/MS compatible container. Hence, we introduce a portable device that extracts VOCs from alveolar air into a compact container. Sample container is a polymer filament inside a metal needle and can be analyzed directly using GC/MS system without further sample preparation. The device presented in this paper mainly consists of two parts: (1) An alveolar air separator, (2) A VOC extractor. The alveolar air separator identifies when alveolar air is expired based on the volume of air expired and directs the alveolar air towards the VOC extractor [10]. VOC extractor collects the VOCs in alveolar air into a modified Solid Phase Micro Extraction (SPME) filament (65μm PDMS/DVB, fused silica, 24 Ga, Supelco). SPME filament can be removed from the device and inserted into a GC/MS system for analysis.
Alveolar air separator diverts dead space air to an exhaust path and directs alveolar air into alveolar air channel [10]. The device consists a Fleisch type flow meter, a flow diverting gate as shown in Fig. 1. The flow diverting gate is mounted on a plunger of a pull type linear solenoid actuator. When the actuator is energized, the flow diverting gate is in the position shown in Fig. 1(a). During this stage exhaled air is diverted to an exhaust path. Once the actuator is de-energized, the flow diverting gate moves into the mouthpiece and directs exhaled air through the alveolar air channel as shown in Fig. 1(b). Dimensions for the exhaled flow measuring mouthpiece are determined by a study conducted to evaluate the user comfort level of flow meters that require breathing for an extended period of time [11].
Flow meter of the alveolar air separator is calibrated using a commercial spirometer (Minispir, Medical International Research USA, Inc.). The flow meter and the commercial spirometer are serially connected forming a single channel. Nitrogen gas is flown through the channel and pressure drops across the resistance structure of the Fleisch type mouthpiece and the corresponding flow rates are recorded. Using this data, exhaled flow rate is expressed as a 5th order polynomial transfer function of pressure. The transfer function is included in the Digital Signal Controller (DSC) to obtained volumetric flow rates based on the differential pressure. Accuracy of the flow sensor is tested using a 3L calibration syringe. 3L of ambient air is emptied into the mouthpiece at various flow rates. Flow rates obtained by the flow sensor are integrated with respect to time to derive volume passed through the sensor and compared with the actual volume passed through the sensor (3L). The flow meter meets the error standard (3% or less) required for clinical spirometers.
For a young adult male, dead space volume is about 30 percent of the entire exhaled volume [1]. Dead space air is followed by alveolar air. Alveolar air separator calculates the average dead space volume of the first three breath cycles. This value is used as the threshold to determine the transition from dead space air to alveolar air. In the consecutive breath cycles, when the exhaled volume exceeds the threshold volume alveolar channel is opened. Alveolar channel remains closed during dead space air expiration and inhalation.
A schematic diagram of the device is shown in Fig. 2. The device directly extracts VOCs from exhaled air into a modified SPME filament, thus eliminate the need for collecting the entire breath volume over a multiple breath cycles into a large gas-sampling container. The criteria needed to use SPME filaments for direct breath sampling is the following. (1) Amount of VOCs extracted during the short alveolar portion of the breath is proportional to the concentration of the VOCs in the sample. (2) Extraction is independent from the flow rate. (3) Total exposure time is a constant.

Alveolar VOC extractor consists a modified SPME filament and a solenoid linear actuator. The linear actuator moves the filament out of the needle only when the alveolar channel is opened. The time SPME filament is exposed to alveolar air is continuously monitored. The third criteria is satisfied by maintaining the total exposure time constant using a timer.
First two criteria are experimentally validated and described in the following sections.
1ppmv, 2ppmv and 3ppmv acetone gas standards are prepared in gas sampling bags. SPME filament is used to extract acetone from the gas sampling bag. The filament is exposed to the sample for 10 seconds continuously and this method of extraction is referred as continuous extraction. Abundance of acetone collected using the continuous extraction method is measured using GC/MS system and compared to pulse extraction method. In pulse extraction, the filament is exposed approximately one second at a time for a total exposure time of 10 seconds. The pulse extraction method is similar to SPME filament exposure pattern expected in the alveolar air VOC extractor. Experiments were conducted for all three different concentrations. Prior to each test SPME filament is kept in the GC for 5 minutes at 250°C and gas sampling bags are purged three times with Nitrogen gas. SPME filaments are extremely time sensitive at short exposure times. Following method is used to accurately measure the filament exposure time during the experiments. SPME syringe is mounted on a breadboard and the plunger of the syringe is physically connected to a linear potentiometer. Potentiometer is connected to ADC of a DSC. Corresponding voltages when filament is inside the needle and when the filament is outside the needle is determined and a threshold voltage for filament exposure is set. When threshold voltage is exceeded when the plunger is pressed, a timer is activated and the filament exposure time is recorded. Abundance of acetone fragment 43 at various concentration for continuous and pulse extraction are plotted in Fig. 3. Continuous and pulse extraction methods show similar abundance of acetone fragment 43. We believe slightly lower abundance in pulse extraction may due to over estimation the exposure time. The significant outcome of the evaluation is that the abundance of acetone collected using the pulse extraction method is linearly proportional to acetone concentration in the sample.
Acetone gas standards are prepared in gas sampling bags. Gas sampling bags are connected to a vacuum pump. The pump regulates the flow rate by varying the supplied power. The outlet of the vacuum pump is connected to a tube where SPME filament can be inserted into the channel through a septum. SPME filament is exposed to the flow stream of acetone gas pumped out from the gas-sampling bag for constant amount of time. Experiment was repeated at different flow rates for different concentrations. Experiment is also conducted for dynamic flow rate change that mimics the exhaled flow rate. Based on the results showed in Fig. 5there is no statistically significant difference among the abundance of extraction of acetone at different flow rates.
Alveolar air VOC extractor is validated using the following method. Subject sits upright and breath through the device at a comfortable breathing rate. The device determines the threshold volume for dead space air at the end of the first three exhaled cycles and begins extracting VOCs from alveolar air starting from the fourth exhaled cycle. SPME filament is selectively exposed to alveolar air for total alveolar air exposure time of 1 minute. Once the VOC extraction is completed SPME filament is removed from the device and abundance of acetone is measured using the GC/MS system. Once sampling using the device is completed, alveolar air is manually collected into a gas-sampling bag. Subject exhales the last portion of the breath into the gas-sampling bag until the bag is filled with alveolar air. SPME filament is inserted in the gas-sampling bag for one minute and abundance of the acetone is measured. Acetone gas standards of 0.166ppmv, 0.333ppmv, 0.666ppmv, 1ppmv and 2ppmv are prepared for calibration purposes. SPME filament is exposed in each gas standard for one minute. Abundance of acetone extracted is measured and calibration curve is obtained. The calibration curved is then used to quantify acetone in breath samples collected using the device and gas sampling bag. Acetone concentration in exhaled breath determined by the sample obtained by the alveolar air VOC extractor is comparable to the acetone concentration in gas sampling bag and acetone concentration is within the range of a healthy person.
The alveolar air VOC extractor is developed as a POC device for convenient breath sampling. A quantifiable breath sample is collected by simply breathing through the device for a few minutes. Although only acetone is quantified in device validation, the device's extraction is non-selective and abundance of other VOCs of interest can be measured using the same method. The sample container is compatible with most GC/MS systems. The device's ability to selectively extract VOCs from alveolar air is demonstrated. It also has the capability of selectively extracting VOCs from dead space air. This information is helpful in determining the origin of a VOC. In addition to clinical breath sampling, the device has applications in monitoring environmental VOC exposure.
Crystal structure and thermoelectric properties of an organic compound of tetrathiafulvalene (TTF) and iodine (I), TTF-I 0.71 , were investigated. From X-ray diffraction of TTF-I 0.71 powder prepared by a solid state reaction, the superspace group of TTF-I 0.71 was determined as C2/m(α0γ)0s. The TTF-I x thin films were also fabricated on a glass substrate. It was found that the actual composition x increased with film thickness, and reached to about 0.72 above 300 nm. The Seebeck coefficient and electrical conductivity of the films showed time-dependent change, probably due to the homogenization of iodine concentration in the film.
Crystal structure and thermoelectric properties of an organic compound of tetrathiafulvalene (TTF) and iodine(I), TTF−I0.71, were investigated. From X-ray diffraction of TTF−I0.71 powder prepared by a solid state reaction, the superspace group of TTF−I0.71 was determined as C2/m(α0γ)0s. The TTF−Ix thin films were also fabricated on a glass substrate. It was found that the actual composition x increased with film thickness, and reached to about 0.72 above 300 nm. The Seebeck coefficient and electrical conductivity of the films showed time-dependent change, probably due to the homogenization of iodine concentration in the film.
Black pepper is one of the common spices used in foods as a favoring agent. Their utilization is diversified into other applications such as pepper spray for defense, medicine for healthcare and pest control in the agriculture sector. In order to meet the industry demand, various countries with a suitable tropical climate have grown black pepper as one of their export commodities. Indirectly, reputation and quality of the black pepper are associated with the growth origin as the soil quality, handling processes, and growing environment will influence the final grade of the black pepper. Geographical origin has become one of the parameters in determining the price of the pepper. In view of this, there is a pressing demand to have a standard to identify the growth origin of black pepper to avoid counterfeit issues with the intention to scope for higher market price. This paper reports an attempt to determine the growth origin of black pepper (Piper nigrum L.) based on the volatile organic compounds (VOCs) profile recorded using high resolution gas chromatography mass spectrometry system. In this work, black peppers from two different countries of origin; namely from Malaysia and India were selected as a case study. A total of 252 of black pepper samples from these two origins were extracted for non-polar compounds using a standard method and the VOCs profiles were then subjected to Principal Component Analysis (PCA) and Fold Change Analysis. PCA cluster plots showed that Indian and Malaysian black pepper can be confidently discriminated by means of unique non-polar compounds present in the pepper samples.
Black pepper is a type of herb that has a bead-shape of about the size of 5 mm in diameter and has a strong pungent aroma. It is commonly used as food flavoring agent in the form of grinded powder. In addition, there are also efforts to extract the active compounds for different applications such as antimicrobial [1] and therapeutic [2] agents. The commonly grown species is the Piper nigrum L. and major cultivation is mostly in areas with a tropical climate. Although the pepper berry can be of same species, they can have different chemical properties depending on the handling of the harvest, location of plantation and the post-harvest processing process [3] . The main differences are due to the soil type, type of fertilizer applied, rainfall patterns, pesticides used, post-harvest processing, storage, etc. The combination of all these factors eventually will be referred as to the growth origin of the black pepper as a whole by the community since the plantation practices and growing environment will be location specific. This has also driven the market to tag the price of the black pepper not only based on the physical properties such as size and density, but at the same time taking into consideration the growth origin as an important factor.
Since the growth origin plays an important role in the black pepper market, there will be a need to have standards to differentiate the production origin. Lack of such measures lead to the issue of intended mislabeling of geographical origin to those locations that can fetch higher market prices. One of the possible options for the standard development will be via the chemical profiling of the black pepper. Chemical composition is the factor that governs the final taste of the black pepper. Also, it will be affect the value since the presence of the active ingredients such as the signature compounds of piperine and oleoresin will determine the price based on the extractable amount. However, the determination of the total chemical profile of the black pepper will be quite complex due to the presence of a huge number of chemicals, with most of them at very trace levels. This study proposed the chemical profiling to be performed to determine the growth origin of black pepper based on only the volatile organic compounds (VOCs). This will reduce the type of chemicals presence in the profile during the analysis for ease of data handling while the concept can be translated into robust sensing probe using the working principle of gas sensors. For an initial study purpose, black peppers from two countries of origin, Malaysia and India were selected and the VOCs were detected using gas chromatography with a mass spectrometry detector. The profiles recorded were then analyzed using standard Principle Component Analysis (PCA) and Fold Change Analysis (FCA).
All chemicals, solvents and gases used in this study are of analytical ultrapure grades that were used without further purification unless otherwise stated.
A Thermo Scientific Accelerated Solvent Extraction (ASE) system was used for the extraction of the non-polar VOCs. Thermo Scientific Q Exactive Gas Chromatography system (QEGC) was used to separate and determine the different chemical compounds from the pepper extract. The chemical profile was determined using Compound Discoverer from a compound library and PCA analysis was perform on the data to identify the significant difference of the chemical profiles from the peppers of two different growth origins.

A total of 252 samples of approximately 100g for each sample were used for this study. 143 black green pepper samples of most popular cv. Panniyur 1 and Karimunda were collected from farms in Kerala, India. 109 green pepper samples of cv. Kuching, Semongok Emas and Semongok Aman were collected throughout Malaysia. All the green pepper samples were sundried to the moisture content of around 12% and the final obtained samples in the form of black pepper were placed in sealed sample bags for further analysis.
The extraction of the non-polar VOCs was performed by first cracking approximately 6 g of the berries using a mortar and pestle. The cracked samples were mixed with enough Diatomaceous Earth (ASE Prep DE, Sample Dispersant and Drying Agent) and poured inside the extraction cell. The samples were assigned with a number code and placed onto the cell rack. The vial corresponding to the extraction was placed into the vial tray to assist collection. Hexane extraction method was employed by rinsing the cracked pepper with hexane (100%). This was performed with controlled conditions of 100 °C in an oven for 5 minutes. The extract was in the form of a clear and yellowish liquid in the collection vial with 2.0 mL of the yellowish liquid pipetted into a 3.0 mL Luer lock syringe to be filtered using Minisart PTFE filter. The filtered liquid was poured inside 2.0 mL amber glass vial. The sample was then analyzed using the QEGC. The injector was rinsed using 5.0 mL after every cycle of injection using 100% hexane. The QEGC was running on a temperature gradient mode with a total analysis time of 36 minutes per sample, having an initial holding temperature at 40 °C for 2 minutes and subsequent 10.0 °C per minute until the end temperature of 330.0 °C. The final temperature was held for 5 minutes before cooling down.
The extraction method and gas chromatography setup based on temperature gradient mode have revealed a great amount of VOCs content from the pepper at both growth origins from Malaysia and India. This reflects that the method used is effective for the detection of the compounds from the pepper. Within the retention time set, both pepper extracts were shown to have over 200 different types of compounds, with some at very trace level. The majority of the compounds are present in both the pepper samples with some signature peaks that are origin dependent and shown in Table 1 . This is the first insight that the VOCs can be used as the standard method to differentiate black pepper of different origins due to the different compound composition.
As a whole, the chromatograms recorded from the two black pepper samples are shown in Figure 1 . As mentioned earlier, there are quite a few peaks that overlap at the same retention time, indicating that the same compound is present in both samples since the analysis parameters are identical. However, it is noted that the intensity profile indicating the amount ratios of these compounds is significantly different. Taking the strong retention peaks at 12.8 and 27.9 minutes as comparison references, black pepper from India has showed to have comparatively higher concentrations of compounds that are more volatile as supported with the shorter retention time as compared to the one from Malaysia. This chemical profile of the VOCs can be used as a fingerprint to identify the origin of the black pepper.
In order to further differentiate the chemical profiles of the VOCs from the different black pepper samples, data analysis has been carried out using the raw data of the chromatogram. The first analysis performed was the Principle Component Analysis (PCA), a powerful tool to reduce the dimension of the data with minimum loss of information. PCA utilizes a statistical procedure via an orthogonal transformation to convert data sets of possibly correlated variables into a set of values of linearly uncorrelated variables called principal components. As the aim of this study is to explore the possibility of using the VOCs profiles to identify the growth origin, the PCA analysis performed is based on profile input rather than targeted on specific VOCs. The whole data set recorded for the two samples was analyzed using PCA via the Compound Discoverer software provided along with the QEGC. The results obtained ( Figure 2 ) showed that the VOCs profiles can be separated clearly based on the growth origin of the black pepper.
Besides PCA, the data sets were also analyzed using Fold Change analysis. The principle is mainly looking into quantity changes between an original and subsequent measurements performed on a group of targeted samples. In cases where the target samples are of similar property, the output of the analysis will be clustered nearly together and vice versa where the samples are of significant difference, the output of the analysis will be far apart. This will generate a good visualization map for different samples in cluster form. In this case, the chemical profile was taken as a whole for the input of the analysis and subsequent comparison are based on this profile. Figure 3 shows the results obtained from the analysis for all the 252 black pepper samples tested in this study. There result clearly show that the output of the analysis is separated into two clusters and match consistently with the growth origin of the black peppers. This again shows that the VOCs can be used for the detection of the growth origin as demonstrated in the study using pepper from Malaysia and India as a case study.
We have demonstrated that the growth origin of black pepper can be identified using the chemical profile of the VOCs. A case study using black peppers from Malaysia and India has clearly shown that the VOCs profile can be differentiated using standard PCA and Fold Change analysis using the raw QEGC data sets without major data cleaning or pretreatment of the data.
In a microfluidic device developed using a Si micro-pillar array directly coated with an iron catalyst, 4,8-dibromo-1-hydroxy-2-naphthaldehyde was catalytically synthesized with high efficiency. This represents the first dibromination of the organic compound in a microfluidic device. Typical beaker synthesis of the compound takes one day at 50 °C, but the method proposed here was performed at uncontrolled room temperature (23 °C), while reducing the reaction time to about 1 sec.
Bromination of organic compounds is one of the most important reactions in organic synthesis [1]. In particular, dibromination or tribromination are required for high-performance anti-cancer drugs and solar cells. However, some substitution reactions of the bromo group are extremely difficult to induce [2]. A beaker-based method for the dibromination of 1-hydroxy-2-naphthaldehyde typically proceeds as follows: an iron catalyst is added to a chloroform solution of 1-hydroxy-2-naphthaldehyde, followed by dropwise addition of bromine for 30 min, and subsequent stirring in a beaker at 50 °C for one day. This operation is too lengthy, laborious, and suffers from the need to critically control temperature as well as the risk of using hazardous reagents for di- and tribromination. Moreover, this synthesis requires iron as a catalyst.
Recently, microfluidic devices have been used for chemical reactions [3], [4]. Since the diffusion length of a chemical species is short in a micron-scale channel, a rapid reaction rate and efficient synthesis may be realized using such a device. A Y-shaped channel design is often used in devices for simple fabrication, but many chemical species do not contribute to reactions owing to the laminar flow. Recently, the bromination of an organic compound using such a device was reported [5]. In a simple microchannel without an iron catalyst, more than two bromo groups were not added to the organic compound, although monobromination was achieved. Two simple solutions have been considered. First, mixed iron particles were used as reagents (Fig. 1(a)). The iron particles passed through the channel before the chemical reaction occurred or clogged the channel, but dibromination was not observed. Alternatively, the microchannel surface was coated with an iron catalyst using sputtering or vapor deposition (Fig. 1(b)) [6]. Because the surface area in contact with the mixture was only a portion of the bottom surface, and the side wall did not contribute to the catalytic reaction, efficient synthesis was not expected. As a result, the need for efficient and successful microfluidic methods remains for di- and tribromination.
To address this, we developed a new microfluidic device capable of highly efficient catalysis. Figure 2 shows the concept of our proposed device. A pillar array uniformly coated with an iron catalyst was formed in the channel. This structure enhances reagent mixing and increases the contact area between the mixture and catalyst, resulting in high-efficiency di-/tri-bromination. Herein we report the device fabrication, synthesis results, and product analysis.
Figure 3 shows the microfluidic device design. The device consists of channels, a pillar array, two inlets, and one outlet. The channel length and width from the junction where two reagents can meet are ~20 mm and 500 µm, respectively. The pillar array structure has pillars 20 µm in diameter separated by gaps of 40 µm. The design is simple to allow easy fabrication.
Figure 4 shows the device fabrication process. A 200-µm-thick silicon substrate was used. The substrate was patterned and etched by ultraviolet (UV) lithography (MA/BA6, SUSS Micro Tec, Germany) and deep reactive ion etching (RIE-400iPB, Samco, Japan) on both sides to form the channel, pillar array and through holes. Photoresists (TSMR-V90, 27cp, Tokyo Ohka Kogyo, Japan) were used for the channel and pillar array, and through holes (OFPR-800LB, 200cp, Tokyo Ohka Kogyo, Japan) were used for inlets and an outlet. As shown in Fig. 4 (3), holes were not completely pierced through owing to a second uniform spin-coating. Subsequently, the iron catalyst selectively formed by plating on the 50-nm-thick pillar surface using a lift-off process. Since the entire structure needed to be covered with the iron catalyst, electroless plating was adopted. The substrate was immersed into a plating solution for 30 min, after a treatment using tin and palladium was applied. The lift-off process was carried out by organic cleaning. Pillars were observed by field-emission scanning electron microscopy (FE-SEM, S-4800, Hitachi High-Tech., Japan) and analyzed by energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDX, Genesis V6.44J, EDAX). Finally, the microchannel with the pillar array was packaged by anodic bonding, completing device fabrication.
Chloroform solutions of 1-hydroxy-2-naphthaldehyde (Suzuki Chemical Industrial, Japan) and bromine (Suzuki Chemical Industrial, Japan) were employed for the fluid experiment. Reagent concentrations of 50 mmol/L and 450 mmol/L were determined, with reference to the beaker-based method. Subsequently, the two reagents flowed into the device from inlets at a rate of 5 µL/min using syringe pumps, such that solutions reached the outlets in 1 sec. The synthesis was performed at room temperature (23 °C) in air. The mixture removed from the outlet was dried, and a powder was obtained. The products were analyzed by Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR, FT/IR-6200, JASCO, Japan) and fast atom bombardment mass spectroscopy (FAB-MS, JMS-BU25, JEOL, Japan). Finally, the channel surface was reanalyzed after synthesis by FE-SEM and EDX to check the practicality of the proposed device.
Figure 5 shows a bird's-eye view of the pillar array after the lift-off process, revealing that the structure was fabricated as designed. Figure 6 shows the EDX result. An iron peak at 643 eV was detected, confirming that the film on the structure was indeed the iron catalyst. The pillar array coated with the iron catalyst increased the contact area between the mixture and catalyst, resulting in efficient synthesis.
The products obtained during the fluid experiment were identified by FT-IR and FAB-MS. Figure 7 shows the FT-IR spectra of the product. Two peaks were observed at 681.7 cm-1 and 540.9 cm-1, and since C–Br bonds absorb between 690 cm-1 and 515 cm-1, the product was the brominated compound. Figure 8 shows the FAB-MS result. The 4,8- dibromo-1-hydroxy-2-naphthaldehyde (m/z: [328.87+H+]) peak was clearly observed. The FT-IR and FAB-MS results indicate that 4,8-dibromo-1-hydroxy-2-naphthaldehyde was successfully synthesized using the microfluidic device.
Figure 9 shows the cross-section of the channel after the fluid experiment. As shown in top of the pillar, a complete bonding between the silicon pillar and glass was observed. Figure 10 shows the result of the EDX analysis of the pillar side wall. The iron peak disappeared on the pillar side wall after synthesis. Moreover, a tribrominated compound was not confirmed. Therefore, we conclude that a thicker iron coating must be required for more efficient dibromination and tribromination. In future, we will examine film adhesion and optimize the plated catalyst thickness and channel structures.
Table 1 shows the differences between the conventional and proposed methods. The reaction time was dramatically reduced from one day to 1 sec. without temperature control, a remarkable improvement in reaction efficiency was obtained when using a pillar array coated with iron.
We developed a microfluidic device using a Si micro-pillar array directly coated with an iron catalyst. The pillar array structure was fabricated by UV lithography, DRIE and electroless plating. Subsequently, the presence of the iron catalyst was confirmed by an EDX analysis of the structure.
A powder was obtained by a fluid experiment using the device. The product was analyzed by FT-IR and FAB-MS. Peaks of C–Br bonds were detected in the FT-IR spectra, and peaks of the dibromo compounds were observed in the FAB-MS spectra. These results indicate 4,8-dibromo-1-hydroxy-2-naphthaldehyde was successfully synthesized. If this device is optimized for high practicality, it can be widely applied for challenging synthesis applications requiring efficient catalytic reaction.
This work is partly supported by Japan Ministry of Education, Culture, Sports Science & Technology (MEXT) Grant-in-Aid for Scientific Basic Research (A) No. 16H02349 and the Canon Medical Systems Corporation. The authors thank the MEXT Nanotechnology Platform Support Project of Waseda University.
Summary form only. One of the ways to improve of OEL materials is applying metal coordination compounds with organic ligands. Metal coordination compounds combine the features of both inorganic and organic compounds and offer a variety of molecular structures by changing the metals, ligands, coordination numbers and so on. This diversity of molecular structure gives one an opportunity to tone the electronic properties of the molecules, and hence to tune the optical properties. The basic aim of this work is design, synthesis and characterization of a novel and known Eu(lII) and Tb(lII) complexes which not only display a good electron transportability but also give a high luminescent efficiency. On the basis of analysis of literature data, some criteria of efficiency of EL compounds were formulated, and terbium complexes with substituted aromatic carboxylic acids and trivalent europium complex with five-membered heterocyclic and six-membered aromatic ring containing P-diketons were chosen for our study.
Many organic synthesis processes are accompanied by ventilation emissions of exhaust air contaminated with the vapor of volatile organic compounds (VOCs). Recent investigations have shown the efficiency of using electron beams to remove the vapor of VOCs from exhaust air. The use of pulsed electron beams for these purposes has not been, adequately explored yet. The goal of the present work was to study the processes of removal of VOCs from the air by means of a 3-ns electron beam. Subjects of inquiry included acrolein, styrene and benzene, i.e., the most common toxic VOCs present in emissions by various enterprises, synthesizing organic compounds, producing plastic materials, etc.
Cancer risk of exposure of salesperson in an ornament market to volatile organic compounds (VOCs) was evaluated. VOCs were sampled by SUMMA canister and analyzed by thermal desorption-Gas Chromatograph-Mass Spectrometer system. 8-hours average concentrations of dichloromethane and toluene were the highest (110.94μg/m 3 and 58.83μg/m 3 ), which were well below the indoor air quality standard (GB/T 18883-2002). The cancer risk associated with dichloromethane and toluene were exceeded the U.S. EPA benchmark (10 -6 ). The total non-cancer risk was 0.42, which was below the reference level (HI=1) of U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
Volatile organic compounds (VOCs) are common organic pollutants in the ambient air, and listed as one in fourteen pollutants sources of Indoor Air Quality (IAQ) concerned by U.S. EPA [1]. Exposure to VOCs can lead to health impacts such as eye, nose and throat irritation, damage of nervous system, headaches and cancer [2]–[3][4][5]. VOCs were related to poor indoor air quality, and were contributed to sick building syndrome (SBS) because of the increased time people spent at office buildings and homes [6].
VOCs can be emitted from a variety of indoor sources. Previous studies have indicated that several VOCs are emitted from new furnishing, wall coverings, which can release VOCs into the air and cause indoor air quality problem [7], [8]. Since there are more ornament materials and furniture displayed in the ornament markets, IAQ in these places are always poorer than those in general indoor environment. The occupational exposure and health risk of the employees in the ornament market are also concerned by researchers and employees themselves.
In this research, we measured the concentrations of VOCs in an ornament market in Tianjin, China. Cancer risk assessment of VOCs was calculated by the methods of U.S. EPA.
The study was conducted in ZhongChu ornament market in Hedong district, Tianjin, China. The total construction area is 25119m2, which contains 5 zones including cupboard, ceramic tile, radiator, PVC materials and paint. The sampling site was located at cupboard zone. The study group of 41 subjects was all selected from the full-time salesperson in the cupboard zone. Each participant was required to fill in a questionnaire which contains information about other VOCs sources the participant may exposure to (e.g., cooking habits, house decoration recently and tobacco smoking status) as well as the health condition of the participant (e.g., respiratory disease and cardiovascular symptoms).
VOCs concentrations of indoor and outdoor of the ornament market were measured using SUMMA canister in June 20th 2011. The sampling method of SUMMA canister was used to estimate the VOCs in the environment. Indoor and outdoor 8-hours average VOCs samples and indoor 1-hour average VOCs samples were collected during the business hours in this study. The 1-hour VOCs samples were collected at four points simultaneously. Evacuated 6-L canisters assembled with 8-hours mass flow controllers were used to obtain indoor and outdoor daily average VOCs concentration while four 3.2-L canisters assembled with 2-hours mass flow controllers were used to obtain indoor 1-hour average VOCs concentration. All static sampling was performed for VOCs at a height about 1.5m above the ground which is the breath zone of salesperson.
VOCs were pre-concentrated by Entech 7100A 3-Stage Preconcentrator, and then analyzed by Agilent 7890A/5975C GC-MS. We used DB-5MS column (60m×0.32mm×1µm film thickness) for separation.
The Chronic Daily Intake (CDI), also named inhalation intake, is a very important value for risk assessment. It was calculated using the equation (1):
CDI=(Ca×IR×ET×EF×ED)/365×BW×AT(1)

Where, CDI is the inhalation intake (mg/kg/d), Ca is the pollutant concentration (mg/m3), IR represents the adult inhalation rate (0.83m3/h, US Environmental Protection Agency, 1997), ET is the exposure time (8 hours/day), EF is the exposure frequency (250 days/year), ED is the exposure duration (25 years), BW represents the body weight (kg) and AT denotes the averaging time (years). The average weight of participants is 65.73kg based on the questionnaires. 70 and 25 years were selected for carcinogenic and non-carcinogenic assessment respectively.
Cancer risk can be expressed as lifetime cancer risk (LCR), which means the probability of suffering cancer due to toxic chemicals exposure [9]. The LCR was calculated by the equation (2):
CR=CDIca×SF(2)

Where, CR represents carcinogenic risk (mg/kg/day) and SF is carcinogen slope factor (kg day/mg).
Hazard index (HI) is used for non-cancer risk assessment. HI is the ratio of personal exposure to a chemical divided by its reference concentration [10].
HI=CDInc/RfC(3)

Where, HI represents hazard index and RfC is reference concentration for chronic inhalation exposure (mg/m3). Total hazard index was calculated using the following equation (4):
HItota1=∑HIi(4)

Where, i is the number of chemical
The values of carcinogen slope factor and reference concentration for chronic inhalation exposure for particular VOCs were summarized in Table I. For cancer risk, range of 1x10-6 to 1×10-4 is defined as generally acceptable risk, and higher than 10–4 is thought to take some protective measure to prevent cancer. For non-cancer risk, lower than the reference level (HI=I) is safe for human exposure.
A total of 41 salespersons were recruited from the ornament market. Most of the participants are female because of the working characteristic (Male: Female=7:34). The average age is 46.76 ± 7.81. We collected the exposure characteristics and health condition of the participants. Considering the potential contributors of individual VOCs exposure, we collected the information of environmental tobacco smoke (ETS) exposure and fuel type in our questionnaire. Five in the participants were smokers and 36 (63%) reported that they have ETS exposure. Most participants use natural gas as their fuel and spent 46 minutes on average for cooking every day. 14 (34%) participants use cars or bus and 23 (56%) by bike or walk for commuting purposes in this study. For health condition, 9 (22%) of the participants reported that they have rhinitis or pharyngitis and felt chest tightness recently.
 Fig. 1. for all target VOCs, 8-hours indoor concentrations were the highest. Outdoor concentrations were the lowest in the three sampling points except toluene, which concentration for indoor (1hour) and outdoor was 52.16μg/m3 and 59.35μg/m3 respectively. Indoor concentration of total volatile organic compounds (TVOCs) was 2.65 times higher than the corresponding outdoor concentration. The VOCs distribution trend in three sampling points was similar. Dichloromethane, toluene, alpha-pinene and ethyl acetate ranked the top four of the detected indoor 8-hours VOCs with concentrations of 110.94 μg/m3 (29.27%), 58.83 μg/m3 (15.52%), 46.69 μg/m3(12.32%), 42.52 μg/m3 (11.22%). Concentrations of TVOCs and individual VOCs were much lower than the standard limits regulated in the national “Indoor Air Quality Standard” [11]. The 1-hour average concentrations of toluene, benzene, xylenes (mixed) and 8-hours average concentration of TVOCs were 50, 10, 20 and 380 μg/m3 in this study, which corresponding data in “Indoor Air Quality Standard” [11] were 110, 200, 200 and 600μg/m3 Fig. 2. shows the indoor 1 hour average level of VOCs in the ornament market. Dichloromethane, toluene, ethyl acetate, alpha-pinene and naphthalene ranked the top five of all the detected VOCs. Mean concentrations of dichloromethane and toluene were 106.99μg/m3and 52.16μg/m3, which were higher than the other 17 VOCs with concentrations from 0.32μg/m3 (chlorlbenzene) to 33.01μg/m3 (ethyl acetate).
The cancer and non-cancer risk were shown in Table 1. Seven VOCs were selected due to the availability of slope factor and reference concentration. We used the 8-hours average concentration of VOCs for risk assessment. Benzene is a proven human carcinogen and dichloromethane is a probable carcinogen. The toxicity of benzene is highest, but due to its greater inhalation intake, dichloromethane exhibits the maximum lifetime cancer risk. Both of them were exceeded a 1x10-6LCR.
Regarding non-cancer risk, the hazard index for individual VOCs ranged from 1.99E-04 for carbon disulfide to 3.78E-0 1 for naphthalene. The total hazard index was 0.42, which was below the reference level (HI=I).
Measurement of personal exposure to VOCs using personal monitoring is the most accurate [12]. However, limited by the time and cost, we used the concentrations of ambient VOCs in micro-environmental for risk calculation. This may cause the uncertainties in measurement. In addition, short-term monitoring of VOCs might ignore daily variations, which lead to different result from long-term monitoring [13]. What's more, cancer risk and non-cancer risk were calculated basing on middle aged person, which can not represent the entire population working in ornament markets. Finally, we used U.S. EPA's parameters for risk assessment, this may ignored the difference of constitution between Chinese and American.
In this study, concentrations of VOCs were measured in an ornament market in Tianjin, China. Concentrations of dichloromethane and benzene were the highest (29.27%, 15.52% respectively). Although some VOCs were well below the Indoor Air Quality Standard, they could still be a reason to cause SBS symptoms [14]. According to the results of LCR, benzene and dichloromethane had exceeded the U.S. EPA bench mark of 10-6. Regarding non-cancer risk, the hazard index was below 1, and naphthalene contributed most to the non-cancer risk. This study indicated that long time exposure to VOCs in ornament markets may lead to cancer, but limited by the sampling size, the accuracy of this study is uncertain. Further studies are needed to explore the relationship of occupational exposure and the health impacts.
Summary form only given. Non-thermal plasma (NTP) is a promising technology for volatile organic compounds (VOCs) abatement characterized by high energy efficiency, high degradation rate and small secondary pollution. But the energy consumption is still an important concern for the removal of VOCs. Many studies have shown that, compared with the AC power, the pulse discharge plasma can greatly reduce energy consumption. And combining of NTP with heterogeneous catalysis has shown to not only further improve the energy efficiency, but also can reduce the formation of unwanted by-products. In this paper, we combined self-developed pulsed power supply with catalyst to study the degradation of xylene by dielectric barrier discharge (DBD). We investigated the effect of catalyst addition on the energy efficiency and degradation efficiency of xylene. And the relationship between the conversion rate, mineralization rate and the energy density was studied. In addition, the spectra of DBD were diagnosed by an emission spectrometer to analysis the excited particles in plasma and the gas chromatograph-mass spectrometer was used to analysis the by-products of the reaction. Through the analysis of the experimental results, we deduced the chemical reactions of xylene in the degradation process.
Non-thermal plasma (NTP) is a promising technology for volatile organic compounds (VOCs) abatement characterized by high energy efficiency, high degradation rate and small secondary pollution. But the energy consumption is still an important concern for the removal of VOCs. Many studies have shown that, compared with the AC power, the pulse discharge plasma can greatly reduce energy consumption. And combining of NTP with heterogeneous catalysis has shown to not only further improve the energy efficiency, but also can reduce the formation of unwanted by-products. In this paper, we combined self-developed pulsed power supply with catalyst to study the degradation of xylene by dielectric barrier discharge (DBD). We investigated the effect of catalyst addition on the energy efficiency and degradation efficiency of xylene. And the relationship between the conversion rate, mineralization rate and the energy density was studied. In addition, the spectra of DBD were diagnosed by an emission spectrometer to analysis the excited particles in plasma and the gas chromatograph-mass spectrometer was used to analysis the by-products of the reaction. Through the analysis of the experimental results, we deduced the chemical reactions of xylene in the degradation process.
An electronic nose is an instrument intended to mimic the human sense of smell. Electronic noses (e-nose) employ an array of chemical gas sensors, a sample handling system and a pattern recognition system. Pattern recognition provides a higher degree of selectivity and reversibility to the system leading to an extensive range of applications. These ranges from the food and medical industries to environmental monitoring and process control. Many other types of different gas sensors available. These include conducting polymers (CP), metal oxide semiconductors (MOS), piezoelectric, optical fluorescence, quartz crystal microbalance (QCM) and amperometric gas sensors. The ideal gas sensor would exhibit reliability, robustness, sensitivity, selectivity and reversibility. High selectivity with high reversibility is difficult to attain. After signal processing and feature extraction the output of the sensors provide a unique ldquosmellprintrdquo for that substances which can be used to classify, measure concentration, or verify quality. The present paper illustrates the function of electronic nose, its application and investigates the effective use of e-nose in detecting gases that have some smell developed by the volatile organic compounds (VOC) like ethanol, acetone and benzene at different concentrations. The response and characteristics prove that the Electronic nose is a reliable instrument which can be used for environment control (air quality, pollutants, and gas emission levels), medical science (urine, skin and breath odour etc.), food industry (coffee, milk, soft drink fish, meat etc.), pharmaceutics, chemical industry, Defence and security industries (detecting humanitarian land mines etc.) and semiconductor industrial processes.
The human nose has been used as the judge for food and perfumes for years [1]. The best way to know how fresh the food is to give it a sniff. If the smell of food is well, it is fresh [2]. But how do we smell? After few hours of smelling, even the best inspector's nose can come up a bit short. And what if we have caught a cold? That's where Electronic noses come in handy. An electronic nose automatically detects and recognized odours, vapour and gases. These are not limited by human factors such as fatigue, exposure to toxins and inability to detect come compounds [1]. Instrumental methods of determining volatiles, such as gas chromatography – mass spectrometry (GC/MS), are expensive and require trained personnel. As a result there has been a drive to establish a device for rapid, inexpensive analysis of volatile organic compounds (VOC) that do not require specialist technicians. As a result there has been a drive to establish a device for rapid inexpensive analysis of volatile organic compounds (VOC), which doesn't require specialist technicians [3].
Persaud and Dodd first reported the design of an electronic nose (E-nose) using chemical sensors and pattern recognition in 1982. An e-nose is an instrument consisting of an array of reversible but only semi-selective gas sensors coupled to a pattern recognition algorithm. The selectivity of the instrument is achieved through the application of pattern recognition techniques to the responses from the senor array [3].
The possibility of using electronic nose for applications in medical field has garnered increased research attention as of late. Several studies indicate that when people are afflicted with ailments such as diabetes, lung cancer, urinary tract infections, biological samples collected from them produce a discernable pattern of volatile organic compounds (VOCs) [1]. This forms, in essence, a “smell signature” for the disease that can be used to diagnose the condition with reasonable accuracy.
The basic electronic circuit is shown in fig. 1 for chemical identification using an array of sensors where each sensor is designed to respond to a specific chemical, the number of unique sensors must be at least as great as the number of chemicals begin monitored. The output characteristics of each sensor must be related with each other.
The commercial Electronic Noses use sensors like conducting polymer sensors (CP), piezoelectric– surface acoustic wave (SAW), thickness shear mode (TSM), metal oxide semiconductor (MOS), metal oxide semiconductor field effect transistor (MOSFET), electrochemical (EC), Pellistor and optical sensor arrays are reviewed by Albert et al. [4] and James et al. [5].
The sensing element of sensors is a tin oxide (SnO2) semiconductor which has low conductivity in clean air. In the presence of a detectable gas, the sensor's conductivity increases depending on the concentration of gas in the air. A simple electrical circuit can convert the change in conductivity to an output signal which corresponds to the gas concentration.
The conducting polymer sensors used in electronic noses actually designed with thin films of insulating polymers loaded with carbon black as a conductive medium, to form polymer carbon composite. The polymers are selected by statistical analysis of responses of these films to a subset of the target compounds used.
Since the resistance in most of the polymer-carbon composite films is sensitive to changes in temperature, heaters are included on back of the ceramic substrate to provide a constant temperature at the sensors. This constant temperature, 28, 32 or 360C, depending Nose (TGS-822) of Figaro Company of Japan has been used.
The detection process of an Electronic Nose is shown in fig. 2. This process is divided into five groups namely, raw measurement, pre-processing, feature extraction, pattern recognition, classification and decision making. The initial block in the figure represents the electronic nose hardware, which typically consists of a gas sensor array. Preprocessing compensate for sensor drift, compress the transient response of the sensor array, and reduces sample to sample variations.
Feature extraction has two purposes: to reduce the dimensionality of the measurement space to a lower dimensional space in order to avoid problems associated with high dimensional space datasets, and to extract the information relevant for pattern recognition. The resulting low dimensional feature vector is then used to solve a given prediction problem, typically classification, regression, or clustering. Classification task address the problem of identifying an unknown sample as one from a set of previously learned odorants. In regression task, the goal is to predict a set of properties (e.g. concentration, quality etc.) for an analyte. Finally, in clustering tasks the goal is to learn the structural relationships among different odorants. A final step is the selection of models and parameter settings and the estimation of the true error rates for a trained model by means of validation techniques.
The application areas for electronic nose are growing on the basis of the results so far achieved on behalf of numerous research groups and more and more companies on the market. They are the following:
1.	Environmental control (air quality, pollutants, gas emission levels of factories, chemical plant monitoring etc.)
2.	Medical applications such as urine skin and breathe odour analysis, ulcer monitoring etc.
3.	Food industry (coffee, soft drinks, fish, meat, wine aroma control, fermentation process, identification of bacterial organism etc.)
4.	cosmetics/perfumes and aroma
5.	Defence and security industries (detecting humanitarian land mines etc)
6.	Pharmaceutics, chemical industry (measuring odour, quality control of pharmaceutical compounds etc.)
7.	Semiconductor industrial process and others.
The characteristic graphs for different volatile organic compounds with different concentrations using smell sensor TGS-822 are shown in fig. 3. The compounds used are ethanol, acetone and benzene with different concentration. Other chemical compounds can be used in electronic noses for detection of their smells.
The characteristic of three volatile organic compounds shows that the electronic nose can be used for other gases which are harmful. Thus an electronic nose is a reliable instrument for the detection of harmful gases. Many methods of pattern recognition are available which can be used in electronic nose. For accuracy, sensitivity, and selectivity of an electronic nose a comparative analysis of different pattern recognition techniques is required. On larger scale an array of such sensors can be employed to construct an electronic nose and different techniques can be used for the analysis of a mixture of various volatile organic compounds.
